One of my hobbies is wood carving. I carve once a week with a group of highly talented people. From time to time one of them will give a class.
So, what we see here is that Jesus tells us a sort of hierarchy for how to carry out Church Discipline. We first go individually. Then we take one or two others. Then we tell it to the church. Then we treat them as the pagan or the tax collector. In contemporary church circles – specifically that of the neo-reformed movement exemplified by Mark Driscoll’s Mars Hill in Seattle – this has come to mean that we ought to call people out harshly. If that doesn’t work, we send in the church’s elders in to beat them up a bit tag-team style. If that doesn’t work we kick them out of the church and tell anyone who is a member that they ought not talk to them anymore.
I'll try and go to the funeral when it's arranged. I'll stand next to Ian. He has less hair than he used to, I have all of mine but it's flecked with grey and silver nowadays. I'll remember his dad talking to us scathingly about music, or those fantastic moments when we came across him listening to Ian's Nick Cave and New Order records and described them as "Not too bad."
Humayan's Tomb is a huge green oasis hidden within a large red stone wall with the towering domed mosoleum in the centre. We hung around until sunset enjoying the peaceful grounds filled with the sounds of the qawwali singers in the distance.
The other thing I really like about blogging and Twitter is its randomness: I've learned loads about related and unrelated fields from other academics, let alone from the hundreds of other people I follow and who follow me. I don't care who you are: if you inform, educate or entertain me, you've added to my world. This may not sound controversial, but too many academics are inclined to assume that the Great Unwashed have nothing to say to us or we to them. I dread researching and teaching into a vacuum like that. So I guess Plashing Vole is here to stay. Keep reading, but start reading others - like Rohan and her colleagues.
“I’ve heard more from Rahm in six months than I heard from Andy Card in six years, and Card’s daughter worked for me,” said former Representative Tom Davis, Republican of Virginia, referring to a chief of staff under President George W. Bush.
I personally believe the early stories in the Bible are no more “literally” true than ancient Norse myths. But I am prepared to put that aside for one moment, and consider this issue under the rules that the “literalists” would apply, because many argue that the oft-trotted-out “Biblical” case against homosexuality simply doesn’t appear to “stack up”.
One of our regular commenters pointed us to a study in the Journal “Nature” which purports to say that industrial farming outperforms organic farming. We weren’t able to read it, because it was a paid subscription. But the headline and the summary said that was its conclusion.
Place the sauce pan to medium- high heat and add the 1 cup of water with the 1 cup of sugar. When it comes to a boil, lower the heat, add the lemon slices and simmer for 30 minutes.
This is the very first time ever… EVER… that I am walking in as a full time university student. Ive always been the ‘mature age part timer’, the one who doesnt form relationships with other students because she has to go to the office instead of the coffee shop. The one who cannot catch up for group assignments because she has to fly to Sydney. And although ‘mature’ may be a stretch of the imagination, I was definitely an outsider.
My income the next year fell by 75 percent. Fun! It’s now barely back to 50 percent of that figure. In 2008, 24,000 journalists lost their jobs.
Say goodbye to your precious cheeseburgers because you’re now going to have a garden salad.
In a large bowl, whisk all dry ingredients together. In smaller bowl stir all liquid ingredients together until well combined and eggs are beaten up. Slowly pour liquid bowl into dry bowl and stir together. Fold in white chips and raspberries. Pour into greased bread pan and bake at 325 for 60 minutes or until a toothpick comes out clean.
has no chance but to agree that Jung-Ah could live in Jae-Hyuk’s NY apartment for the time being. (eeehmm…right….@_@)
Breaking
20.Interruptions. If you are in the middle of a conversation with a superior or in a meeting that has been interrupted, it is best to look away from the person dealing with the interruption in an effort to give them privacy and to indicate you have disengaged yourself from something that is not your business.
The blue ribbon trimmed in gold came from my stash also, but I'm pretty sure I got it from Michaels. I used my Bow Easy to tie my double looped bow. The sentiment is from a set by Pebbles Inc. (I got it from my local Hobby Lobby)
He trusts that we will be equal to it.
Eww, speaking of food…
Altantuya was 28-years-old when she was murdered by 2 former bodyguards of Najib’s in a jungle clearing in Selangor. She was shot in the face and bombed with C4 to prevent identification, and many also say, to destroy any evidence that she had been pregnant at the time of her killing as she had purportedly told her killers. The two men are now on death row, still awaiting an appeal date despite having been judged guilty in 2008.
We'll see you around!
Let's see, what else came out of that closet? Oh - the former shelves. Those will go down to our laundry room. We have a cupboard full of old wooden shelf pieces. They were actually here when we moved here and since they were already here, we can't get rid of them because they don't belong to us. But we are welcome to use them anywhere in the house. I figure that I can put these boards in there with those ones (they are similar in style, wood tone and everything).
So in the movie theater... not much talking going on in there, so maybe that was a good thing since we're both not very good at starting conversations. In the middle of the movie, I put my arm on the arm rest and my hand got near his hand. That was my move. He took the signal and kinda inched his pinky onto my hand, so I quickly grabbed onto his hand... a scary part was coming up so I was glad he did it. :P By the way.. I'm SOOO bad when it comes to watching scary movies. I JUMP at the slightest thing. You'd probably be embarrassed to know me if you were with me in the theaters watching a scary movie. BUT, I tried to keep it in control as much as possible when with him. I kinda took advantage of that a little bit to get closer to him ;) He didn't seem to mind. Plus he was saying he was cold in the theater so I tried to get close without making it obvious that we were two gay guys holding onto each other.
DE: It sounds like Vern gets his Bond on in this book. I’m sure Sister Grace had a few thoughts on NOT being a stereotypical spy twinkie sidekick in a bikini. Has their relationship changed at all in this book? Gotten stronger? More conflicted?
That brings me nicely to a conversation I had last night at the pub. Talking to an ex-runner who really knows everything there is to know about running (imagine me here rolling my eyes, because this person certainly thinks they know all about running) I encountered what I can only call back-handed encouragement. I’ve referred to this person before; someone who no matter what they say they always manage to make me feel as if I should just give up. I am rubbish. I don’t have the commitment to become a better runner. I shall always be a jogger. I will never improve my times. I can’t run half-marathons because I walk. Blah blah blah. You get the sad picture.
No music is breaking me from it's claws
I can’t choose. I love all of my "bad boy" characters. In Perfect Chemistry, Alex has a heart of gold and is so dedicated to his family and the ones he loves. I love him. On the other hand is Carlos, who loves to live his life on the edge and loves adventures and challenges. And on the third hand, Caleb is so self-sacrificing that he changes his life just to protect his sister while at the same time helping Maggie discover her true strength. I’m sorry, I can’t pick. I’ll take them all.
They claim that the Paitan Forest Reserve issue only surfaced after a huge tract of land encompassing Beluran, Pitas and Kota Marudu districts was parcelled out as a forestry management unit (FMU) to a company by the name of Begaraya Sdn Bhd.
THE ONE AND ONLY is Kim Lenz's second album with her Jaguars. Led by guitarist Nick Curran (who joined after a stint with Ronnie Dawson), the band is here joined by pianist Carl Sonny Leyland (who's a member of the Fly-Rite Boys, who back Robert "Big Sandy" Williams, the album's producer). The band's interplay perfectly supports Lenz at every turn, whose vocals can change from a purr to a roar in the space of one line. She handles all the material believably and wrote six of the album's 14 selections. Among the covers is "If You Don't Like My Peaches," which was written by Don Carter for Gene Vincent
JumpStart provides you with an online avatar called a Jumpee (totally customized by your child) that will learn and explore in their educational adventures. The avatar not only play games but can interact with other jumpees that are online as well. Since my daughter is only 4 we didn't do much interacting. Just playing :)
“You ready?” asked Violet.
In other news, I went to visit a company, Digital Ceramics, in Stoke last week in relation to developing a new range of British designed and made ceramics for Whinberry & Antler. It was really great to look around their small factory and workshops and I am looking forward to working with them to build up the Whinberry & Antler home ware range. My plan is to make sure I have the ceramics completed to debut at the Country Living Christmas Fair. Watch this space....!
Thank you all for the great cards that you made for the last challenge. Unfortunately not everybody followed the sketch. So we were forced to remove a few links from InLinkz. And we will do that in the future, but without letting you know before, as we did this time. So please read the rules carefully. It would be a pitty if your card could not be in the prizedraw.
In 1928, Samuel Beckett moved to Paris, and the city quickly won his heart. Shortly after he arrived, a mutual friend introduced him to James Joyce, and Beckett quickly became an apostle of the older writer. At the age of 23, he wrote an essay in defense of Joyce's magnum opus against the public's lazy demand for easy comprehensibility. A year later, he won his first literary prize--10 pounds for a poem entitled "Whoroscope" which dealt with the philosopher Descartes meditating on the subject of time and the transiency of life. After writing a study of Proust, however, Beckett came to the conclusion that habit and routine were the "cancer of time", so he gave up his post at Trinity College and set out on a nomadic journey across Europe.
Slowly add in tamarind mix to warm rice till it reaches desired taste, if required add more salt. After it is mixed let them sit for about three hours for flavors to set in. Goes well with papads or simple potato chips!
Gotong royong – many people, shared goal. Now where in America have we heard that idea?
Meanwhile, in the Big House that looks down on the early morning scene, preparations are being made for yet another day of bluff and bluster by the privileged pontificators who created this new face of the country they laughingly claim to serve.
yet they were still wrinkled in the end.
This is my first "official" LOL day as a blogger. for a long time I was a lurker. Reading, laughing, enjoying, fantasizing, not sure if I should comment or not. I know you are out there. Come on in, share a comment. I have found it is like conversing with an acquaintance, getting to know them better, until you have found a blogging or cyber friend! I went from reading to commenting and then to blogging ( with Master's not so gentle push!)
9. Do not be in a hurry. Rube Goldbergs can take a lot of time, depending on how much the kids bring to it. Don’t rush the process.
I won't lie to you and say that my darling son was thrilled to find carrots and broccoli where once Doritos and Oreos lived. He was far from enthusiastic.
Going Under
My mom and I went for routine fasting blood tests at the lab last week, as a result of our annual physicals at the doctor. We also had to leave urine samples. My poor mom went to the washroom but forgot to actually collect a sample! So the technician gave me the container and we decided to go McDonald's for breakfast. I made sure to get an extra cup of water with our cups of coffee! And all is well that ends well, I was able to deliver the missing sample shortly after breakfast!
“Sounds to me as if it’s herself she’s unsure about.”
'Oh Misha! Misha is my friend.' We hand him the letter.
"Well, I can understand that," I said. "I think the interview segments are the weakest part of the movie."
We had lots of fabulous entries again this week
He is a Professor of History and Chairperson of the Social Sciences Department at the College of Marin in Kentfield, California, instructing courses in United States History, African History, and African American History. Walter is also President of the Board of Directors of Global Exchange, and is an African News analyst for Pacifica Radio Station KPFA.
track even with plenty of software, quarterly updates, and teams of
Where: MonkeyWrench Books (in the backyard), 110 E North Loop
Look at the Second Lebanon War. It began with the kidnapping of soldiers and the killing of soldiers. Does that mean that I am allowed only to kidnap or kill a few Hezbollah soldiers? No. I have to ensure that Hezbollah is not able now or in the near future to carry out a similar action. Self-defense extends to attacking the source of the attack he has just carried out and from which he would be able to attack me again in a moment. If I don’t take action, he will presumably attack me again. He always wants to attack me. I have no reason to think that there will only be one Kassam or Katyusha. He’ll fire another.
It was clearly written by somebody who doesn’t have children. The contents of my handbag are strewn around Dorset on a regular basis, usually in the search for wetwipes, teething rings, my mobile phone etc.
Current home: The Louvre, Paris, France
Roy makes use of simile as if it’s going out of style. On page 4 of the book she writes:
Do you see that? Thyself. That’s right! We need to show ourselves what God says in His Word. How can you claim the promises of His Word if you don’t even know what they are? How can you be a Joseph and have a Joseph victory if you’ve never even read about Joseph and seen what he did to keep himself blameless, humble and praising God, ALWAYS? How can you be a Joshua if you haven’t read and studied what Joshua did before His God to see the great overcoming power that God performed in Joshua’s life? How can you be a Noah and keep your heart continually thinking and praising God allowing you and your whole family to be saved from the destruction of the whole world because of their hearts and thoughts being evil continually? How do you know that it is GOD who works in YOU both to will and do of HIS good pleasure? How do you know. . .
She stopped talking, oh, yeah, she was talking, snapped on some gloves and came over for a closer look.
Stick out their hand.
And these same people (myself included) are slaves to money as a result. We are forced to live where we live, fearful of losing our jobs and our homes as a result, rather than trusting in the Lord.
Japanese:
Now, Julia goes out and gets herself a job. She is covered by the Lilly Ledbetter act for equal pay. Obviously she isn't working at the White House under Obama, because he doesn't pay the women equal pay. Oops.
3. i embarrasingly do not like honey because it tastes way too floral in a sickly way to me
I’ve spent the last 12 weeks trying to get this guine pig through being attacked by the other one. But the scratching is just making him worse and worse he won’t stop. He’s been the vets, he’s had medicine and creams, but nothing. Its like the worst case of exma you’ve ever seen, but he doesn’t know why he’s itching he just is…
Make sure you have the same traits you expect from your future partner.
Britex wasn't open on Sunday, but I managed to duck in for about 15 minutes before heading to the airport yesterday. While I had some trim & ribbon cut, I took a couple of terrible photos just to show the expanse of product.
The examples of unnecessary brackets in direct quotes keep coming. This one is especially noteworthy because it shows us how one quote can go in different directions.
Ordinarily "Weird Al" wouldn't have to worry one bit about having the best musical comedy album in any given year, but he had to drop his latest within a couple months of the new kids on the block. Track for track 2009's Incredibad is funnier, but Turtleneck & Chain continues to develop both the rhythm of their joke writing and their ear for articulating every stupid joke smartasses like me wish we could think up while listening to rap mixtapes.
Funky Monkey Snacks have many health benefits. They have 3 servings of fruit in just one ounce of freeze dried fruit! They are also very low in calories. They are a great way to get your child to eat fruit if they don't eat it fresh. My kids love fruit in any shape or form, so they loved these. The texture is fun. It's crunchy and we enjoyed that. I personally love that this is a great way to put fruit in your child's lunch without having to worry about refrigerating it. Funky Monkey Snacks are great for on the go for the same reason. They are a great snack for people that have allergies. They are free of gluten, wheat, dairy and nuts.
4. Has any reader actively benefited from any PIIPA activity, or does anyone know of someone who has?
Gillian Shields never disappoints when it comes to the Immortal series and I will be the first to admit when I saw ETERNAL I thought it was a continuation of Evie's story-how her life would be now that Sebastian is no longer part of it, upon later research noticed that it was written from the perspective of Sarah.
What's also great about this website is they also offer a volume discount for ordering multiple cards. So, you can personalize just one card or create multiple cards. Plus, you can save your designs in your account and return to them to edit or order them on your own schedule.
All right, ladies and gentlemen, the final revisions are up for the April First Five Pages Workshop. Comment away. These are much stronger, don't you think? I'm impressed with the work the participants have done.
The other part of the Shaman rotation is Water Shield and Earth Shield. These are your two most important buffs, and yes, do require rotational attention as both are removed in pieces by damage. So whatever means you use to monitor these, make sure they stay up. Without Water Shield you will quickly be without mana, and without Earth Shield you will quickly lose a good chunk of your healing. In fact, if I am the only Shaman in the raid, I like to switch the Earth Shield back and forth during tank switches, as well. It might seem obsessive, but I prefer to keep Earth Shield at no less than 3 charges. This helps if my attention is distracted by GTFO telling me to move or a large hit to someone in raid.
This is Lee's quietest movie. All of the sound is diegetic; there is no score. His visual style is reportorial. His camera gathers information without trying to prejudice it. The points of the story are enough, though, and each piece of information is organized by the conceit of the poetry class into a quietly devastating denouement in which Mija vanishes from the screen, leaving behind only her poem and a profound sense of loss. This is very much a film about language. Words, in this film's universe, are talismans, and as Mija loses them and struggles to regain them, so too does she struggle for her own life's meaning.
I close them not only with congratulations for your new Magistrate and for the family and the associates who have made his dedicated career possible but congratulations also, perhaps even more, for the Judges of this District who know a good man when they see him and have now made him one of their own. Here, indeed, we can say with Benjamin Franklin that it has been “the interest of the electors to make the best choice”–something which is very much in the interest as well (the enlightened self-interest as well) of the man inducted today, a man who can be depended upon to cherish still another opportunity to devote his considerable talents to the service of his grateful country.
So...last year I started an annual treasure hunt. Buried Treasure is about digging deep to uncover some hidden gems. The premise is simple. On Thursday July 15 all participating bloggers will re-post one (or more) of their favorite posts that ever appeared on their blog. As you might already know, I don't like too many rules when it comes to art and art collaboratives. So anything goes.
Just time now to remind you about this week's challenge. We'd like to see your Clean and Simple creations please! We are sponsored this week by the always fabulous Stamp Addicts who are giving away a £10 voucher for their online store. And of course, we have our lovely monthly sponsor, Joanna Sheen, who will give a £10 voucher to one winner chosen at random for all of the entries in our February challenges.
I had never seen the film before. My boyfriend, who’s a professional drummer and big Sinatra fan, was extremely excited to see this. We had great seats and settled in for a much more intense experience than I was expecting. I guess I thought most Hollywood movies made in the 1950s were more on the entertainment side. This movie starts out tense from the start. We see that Frank’s character, Frankie Machine (love that!) just got out of jail and has kicked his heroin habit. He’s almost fresh, optimistic, and really excited about pursuing his new skill he picked up in the joint – drumming. It only takes a few seconds in the bar, as Frankie is reuniting with his old friends, until you know – this guy doesn’t stand a chance.
-Continue the applique work further down the hips, especially on the left front, so that the transition from stretchy print to non-stretchy solid feels more organically flowing, and less blunt and jarring, also giving a smoother fit down to hip level.
ache detached from the story! And meanwhile
stir in the chocolate, 1 cup heavy cream and 1 cup of the milk.
I was watching TV one night and I saw a commercial for this new show, House. I was never one to follow shows, and doctor shows usually didn’t interest me. But something about this show sparked an interest. If I were a more avid television viewer, I’d probably watch this show. But no, it was probably stupid like all the others, so I put that interest aside for a while.
Frenchy: "Ze baz, av you look it?"
1 conscience
Through the people we pray for, we have gotten many opportunities to get dirty and to invest into the lives of others. It has been painful to love people through their self-destructing habits, but my husband has taught me something. Speak truth, even when it hurts. It's like scrubbing an infected wound - healing cannot happen if soap and elbow grease isn't applied. Steven's heart for the Gospel and making Jesus knows in dark places in nothing short of admirable. He listens when people need to be heard but speaks truth when it needs to be spoken all so that Christ would be glorified.
whatever work is yours to do, whether it’s a career or family or friendships or yourself…
Phreak: I really think you should reconsider.
There were 16 of us and not one had the right clothes as we were expecting rain and only got sun!
Where you hold me enchain’d a certain time refusing to give me up,
2. Make scrambled eggs
Here then are some samples from those early years of McConnell's career before a certain Fleet Street editor by name of Leonard Matthews spied his work and inundated him with as much work as he could handle for a new project which was to eventually become the famed children's weekly Look and Learn.
I am sending the pasta sauce to Simona of Briciole for Presto Pasta Nights #254, a great pasta event coordinated by Ruth of Once Upon a Feast. Last week was the 5th birthday bash for the event. Belated congratulations to Ruth and all the hosts and participants for keeping it going so long. I am sorry I have been AWOL from the event for so long but glad to be part of the fun again.
Virgin’s Son, make here Your home!
Grey long sleeved tee: Flower
Former members of the board include: Walter Mondale, Condoleezza Rice, Newton Minow, Brent Scowcroft, Amy Pascal, John Reed, Charles Townes, Caryl Haskins, Walter B. Wriston, Frank Stanton, Carl Bildt, Donald Rumsfeld, Harold Brown, Robert Curvin, Pedro Greer, Arthur Levitt, Lloyd Morrisett, Lovida Coleman, Ratan Tata, Marta Tienda, Jerry Speyer, Timothy Geithner, Rita Hauser, Ann Korologos, and Bonnie McElveen-Hunter.
At five fifteen we squelched across Palestine Hill and up the cul-de-sac that led back to the ASC. The swearing continued mutedly right up to the door of the club, whereupon with a quick glance from me the kids stopped almost instantaneously. We shared a smile between us, and pushed the door open wide.
How can I be completely embarrassing one day and then turn around and judge someone else "they are so weird" or "they aren't very kind" or "they hoard money" or "she smells like cheese" Usually someone will have one cheese smelling moment and they smell like cheese forever. Judgments can be so cruel and they stick around for a long time it seems...probably because they turn into fun stories to tell others I suppose...and then the vicious cycle continues.
Billie: Hmm... I want to digsuise myself as Mikey mouse in drag and taunt bulls for a living.
It is with a heavy heart that I write this post. This week we had to say goodbye to our sweet dog, Scotty. Scotty was 13 years old and he shared our lives ever since he was a puppy. He had been suffering with congestive heart failure for a couple of years and finally succumbed to the disease.
“It’s beautiful,” said Kowalski.
For a complete listing of schools offering the Full-day Early Learning Kindergarten program, please refer to the Halton District School Board website at www.hdsb.ca.
39Heshbon and Jazer with their grass-lands, four towns.
Of the process of exposure to elucidation
Because, as much as we love our dogs and identify with them and believe that they are our children, they are not. And, it’s much easier to get away with being selfish with a dog than with a child. Dogs can look at you with those big, brown, liquid, longing eyes, but they can’t verbalize, “Mom, how come you work so much? I could use a little more quality time, here.”
These street-level data, collated with enough ambition and accuracy, could thus be seen as a kind of fossil record for the Blue Angels' weekend performance: a distributed motion-capture device parked throughout the peninsular city. The planes, in other words, left more traces than just artificial clouds: they mapped their own passage through car alarms.
So THANK YOU ALL for all these last 7 years of thinking of Matthew and PRAYING for Matthew. We are BLESSED that we ‘know’ you and we are BLESSED that you love our son, as we do.
That person is like a tree planted by streams of water, which yields its fruit in season and whose leaf does not wither— whatever they do prospers.
1 tbsp sugar or honey (optional)
A dictionary resembles the world more than a novel does, because the world is not a coherent series of actions but a constellation of things perceived.
**( the tea light is a flameless one!)**
Marion McGill, today an attorney and college professor in the western United States and her sister, Trudy, were sent in 1960 by their parents to be interviewed by Drs. Ling and Buckman at the Chelsea Clinic in London. At the time, Marion was 13 years old and her sister was 15. Marion says that both her mother and father were “quite taken with the benefits of LSD and thought that we would also benefit from the drug.” Both parents had undergone a series of ten LSD “treatments” at the Chelsea clinic. Marion goes on:
But it doesn't mean much if you can't get your books into stores.
Later, after all the players were done with the tryouts for their chairs, the two men came out and the moment we had all been waiting for arrived. They said there were two people they wanted to move up into the first violin section, and that was a lady named Carol and another lady named Amy. Amy?!? That was my name. They wanted ME to move UP into the first violin section. They had to have been mistaken. But they weren’t, so I moved over. The lady I had to sit next to was now below me and I thought she was a better player. She spoke softly to me, saying that she had done lousy on her performing the tryout piece. I replied that I must have played TOO WELL since I was moved up into first violins and I felt I was nowhere near ready for that.
The tactic described by him of the police taking action post-match is one which was identified by Assistant Chief Constable Corrigan at the Justice Committee last year as being better for the sake of escalating problems in the ground during a match.
What objects bring back floods of memories for you?
Yesterday's meeting of the Development and Organisation Committee of the UNISON NEC considered a thoughtful report from our Deputy General Secretary (http://www.unison.org.uk/about/board_view.asp?did=2239).
I do think that whatever route helps you get the best out of yourself is a good thing. What works for someone might not be right for someone else.
Lately I've been gravitating toward super simple one-bowl meals, such as this quinoa/roasted beet/cuke/avocado combination. Really good with red wine vinegar on top. Sometimes it's really difficult not to fall into eating the same things all the time, but I'm excited that more produce is coming into season pretty soon.
3/4 yd 45" wide quilting cotton (or home decor weight fabric)
Ayushmann as Vicky Arora is adorable.( I found his dimples sooooo cute!!!) One can’t help falling for him.He glides through the performance.While watching the movie we forget he is Ayushmann the VJ on MTV and think of him as Vicky Arora a charming Punjabi boy.I also loved the character of Bijji , a modern day grand mother who shares drinks with her daughter in law and aspires for a 42 inch LED TV and a 16 GB IPhone…Dolly is a hyperactive Punjabi Mom who had an endearing personality though she continuously nags her son.She is such a pleasant change from the stereo type Punjabi moms shown in Hindi movies.Yamami Gupta as Aashima is charming and looks ravishing.She has a graceful presence. The role of Dr Chadda ,a desperate doctor is tailor made for Anu Kapoor. His hilarious dialogues fetch most of the laughs.A special mention to the actor who played the role of Aashima’s father.He was brilliant in his role.
Underwater To – Tyvek
“If I were an American, as I am an Englishman, while a foreign troop was landed in my country, I never would lay down my arms — never — never — never!”
Boys softball tryouts today after school.
This small conversation quickly led to an interview about who we were, how we met, etc. Fred explained that he was in the U.S. doing his military service (a requirement for all Frenchmen at the time), but before he could even finish the more obnoxious of the two facetiously blurted out: “Oh, does France have a military?” I haven’t met someone this funny since Kathy Bates made a cameo in my French class. She went on to reveal her stupidity with comments like: “Well, if it does, it must be small because I’ve never heard of it.” Fred kindly, without any sarcasm, explained that relative to the U.S., the French army is small because France has a much smaller population and geographically is smaller than the State of Texas. She continued to taunt him. Her friend, embarrassed, finally said: “I’m sorry you don’t know her; she’s really nice and is just trying to be funny.” Exactly. We didn’t know her and she didn’t know us. Before she laid down her “zingers” on Fred, she might have wanted to establish that connection, or at least learn how to say it in French. And reading an atlas on the plane flight over wouldn’t have hurt either.
It seems my blog and I weren't on writing terms for a little while. Not that I have anything against you, Bilingual Butter... I just had a little phase for a while.
She isn't exactly clear, but she's bright
Otherwise known as.... GDA is in the HOUSE!
In an open letter to nice guys everywhere, Phaedra Starling writes:
5. Assist the group in choosing upcoming challenge themes.
The Spurs opened the 4th-Q extending the 3-0 run they were on, to a 16-4 run that blew the game wide open. With the lead now 21, and Gary Neal hitting everything he's putting up, we look unstoppable, yet again. After a Kings bucket, we had another 5-straight (115-91), and from then on, all we had to do was not turn it over. It was a close one for a half, but our shots continued to fall - even through the final seconds. The 127-102 WIN was simply a second-half domination 69-45 that was too much for Sacramento (or most teams, for that matter) to overcome. Spurs had SEVEN guys in double figures, and no one had more than 17. Here is the boxscore..
Assignment 2: Read “I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings” By: Maya Angelou
"Like Dougie and Slick Rick, respect us in this biitch..."
The stretch to Mile Marker 3 was longer than I remembered but the Capitol was up ahead. Huge crowds of runners and lots of spectators. The police did an AWESOME job throughout the race of controlling traffic and so did all the volunteers in their bright yellow vest. Thanks to all of them for a safe race!
3. something unexpected
“Isn’t it.”
This plays well in much of Africa, but it no longer plays well in Zimbabwe, where there is now real economic privation.
She is sassy and isn't afraid to show it! Everyone loves Grumpy Gretchen. We know you will too!
1. He probably doesn’t actually object to my not replying within 0.04 seconds to every single communique he sends. And he’s probably clever enough to realise there will be times when I cannot answer the phone. It’s called “life” .. And I could just be allowed to have one..
Box 1:
Stage 001
Our adventure to see Tintin the movie turned into quite the caravan as along with my wife and I and our two boys (age 9 and 11) we had my niece (10) and nephew (5), a young seminarian poet (23), and a young lady (18). Before I go on in detail about the movie let me say ALL 8 of us enjoyed the movie.
Her Cake..Of course it has to be something really girlie with her! She LOVES ballet and wanted a ballerina cake, I thought she might be disappointed when it was just the slippers, but she loved it!
soul shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall be watered also himself”
Hyejin recommends Seoul just because she loves Seoul, the city, and it's also fun to play and listen to.
I'm not sure what "bigger than the Himalayas" means...you really can't form a mountain much taller than Everest, since rock liquefies under the pressure of anything taller. Only on planets with lower gravity can you do this - for example, Mars has 1/3 the gravity of Earth, and Olympus Mons (tallest mountain on Mars) is 3 times taller than Everest.
My son has applied to a US soccer recruiting firm, to maybe get a College scholarship to a US college, and found out he was successful in passing the first step, so you never know ,watch out you girls-he maybe coming to a college near you,lock up your daughters, and of course I will have to visit,so bring it on!!
Peer support counselors (PSCs) have unique potential to contain Indonesia’s HIV epidemic through targeted interventions with high-risk clients, yet PSCs struggle to track clients and meet reporting needs. We propose an mHealth solution to help PSCs increase client load, prioritize interactions for improved health outcomes, and meet reporting needs.
This is what this charade about the underclass is all about. It tries to hide the fact that the corporate welfare cheats are laughing all the way to the bank with their millions. John Key the NZ Prime Minister is a classic case. A multimillionaire from illgained earnings from currency speculation. An investor in dairying, winemaking, mining, property development, and formerly Tranz Rail. He and his business mates run the NACTs in the interest of making more profits from public asset grabs and insider trading. Meanwhile the sideshow of Benie bashing is designed to force them into shitty work to lower labour costs and encourage profitable investment in 'new jobs' and 'economic growth' in the 'national interest' of the NACTs.
- Interior patch pocket
Moyes has received a lot of stick recently for his comments to the press regarding seeing a top 10 finish as a good season, not necessarily 7th. He is being accused by the fans of lacking ambition, of being too negative. Contrast this with Bobby Mancini up the M62. His similar comments regarding the title being over is now being lauded as a piece of psychological genius, ‘mind games’ mastery, taking the pressure off his players to allow them to play their own game. His flooding the team with defensive players to defend their lead was regarded as a masterstroke from the crafty tactician. Moyes’ attempts to do the same are pilloried as being dour and negative. And yes, I know there is a difference in that Citeh are top and we are 7th but theres also the small matter of a couple of hundred million spent!
The FCC took its first step today toward shifting a large swatch of spectrum from TV broadcast to wireless broadband.
For the past several days (okay,okay it’s been a few weeks) I have been less than prolific. I mean that as a writer. Proliferation is relative and makes me think of profiteroles, which makes me think cookies, which, of course makes me want to slack around some more.
Everyone warns new parents about the terrible two's. But nobody warned me that the tantrums actually start at the age of one. Kate throws tantrums about a variety of things these days and none of them are pretty. She kicks, screams, rolls and bucks during diaper changes. She flings herself from side to side and arches her back when she doesn't want to get in the car. She wails and tries to throw herself to the floor when I put her book away at bedtime.
Many Tamils abroad support their kinfolk in Sri Lanka and also invest money in properties back ‘home’. Greater Colombo has a large Tamil population, estimated as 250,000-300,000 by T. Sridharan and perhaps constituting as much as 12-15 percent of its total.[16] The Wellawatte quarter, where I reside when I visit the country, is a Tamil domain and has seen large apartment blocks springing up in the past 15 years.
We started learning about poetry!!! LOVE, LOVE, LOVE!!!! We talked about all the different types of poetry and then had a discussion why it’s important and how it helps us. I made a rough draft anchor chart when I introduced poetry. As the week went on, and we learned more & read more and more poems, I transferred all of our learning onto a new anchor chart that’s currently sitting on my easel waiting to to be hung up in our reading center.
There’s only two men in this mob-
Saturday: 30 min. run
All Hail All Hail
* 1 cup freshly brewed hot coffee (if you don't have coffee you can just use 1 cup of boiling water)
Short Film (Live Action): The Shore
They are the first animals that have been all mine. It’s a very different dynamic compared to having a pet as a child. They are your buddies then, but Shelby and Lilah are my babies. There’s a lot more responsibility, and a lot more love (at least for me).
Many years ago, I saw a friend back in South Florida about ten years after our high school graduation. My eyes were opened to the world by that time. Through high school, I rarely left South Florida–but after high school I lived in California for ten years and did a fair bit of exploring (traveled to Hawaii, Australia, Hong Kong, and around the USA).
So I’m going to focus on the good things in my life right now. I’m dancing even more than I have been and I’m noticing a huge difference. I took a break from running which I want to get back too, so I’m trying to figure out how to work in running and dance without sacrificing one for the other. I’m so thankful that I have two great ways to exercise and that I have this “problem”. I went so long without it that it’s overwhelming to have it back in my life.
Of course, the end tables usually have medicine bottles, glasses of ice water, cell phone chargers and a way huge ugly alarm clock. But you know, gotta look a little gussied up for pics right? Since the thrifted tables are pretty banged up, and I still haven't sanded and painted them, I cut this vintage thrifted lace panel in half and now we don't get splinters on our end tables at night.
Guinsoo: A centaur with a spear. You know, like in Narnia.
In the months and days leading up to the release of Crazy, Stupid, Love, I heard no such thing. Nobody was saying this was a romantic-comedy made with the man in mind, so imagine my surprise when I watched it this morning. “CSL” succeeds at being a romantic-comedy guys can get into because it doesn’t make love soft or easy, as most men who have been in love know it to be. I imagine a lot of this has to do with the fact that the film is the work of not one but two male directors, Glenn Ficarra and John Requa. It’s as though they were trying to fit in every experience they had or heard about love and marriage through each of the three male protagonists.
If one is looking for evidence that the Bible is the product of men and not the revelation of a transcendent and good being, one need look no further.
Against his resolve, his heart was lulled into acceptance by a strange torpor. Yes, he thought, just for a little while. Anything was better than the black coach and the storm.
Let me hear your thoughts about it, if you read it.
Dentist: Stop laughing.
With Chef Shigefumi Tachibe at the helm for the last 22 years, and his blend of "Euro-Asian" or "Franco-Japonais" fare bringing people back week after week to an area that doesn't have many fine dining stakes in the sand - Chaya Venice admirably does not rest on success, but continually tries to put forth new menus.
Scholars estimate there are over 2600 groups today who lay claim to being the Church, or at least the direct descendants of the Church described in the New Testament. Repeat: 2600!
2Rule and power are his; he makes peace in his high places.
Do you know what the FREED Act is? It’s the Federal Response to the Elimination of Eating Disorders, and it’s a bill that we need YOUR help to pass.
We saw some stunning entries but there can only be one winner as hard as that truly is. Before I announce the winner there is something important I need to remind everyone.
AAM: That sounds absolutely fine. So let us begin, if you wish, in terms of how…what you think of as current events.
CoolSonics 097 ::: Thanks to the original taper & traders! My copy came from The Man In The Palace, so you know it's a royal gem. ::: Corrections welcome ::: This one's for Ena, whether she can still dig this stuff or not... Stevie, Stevie. F'in' great show, one of my absolute favorites by Miller. We get the soft side, the heavy side & a lot inbetween, with great harmonies & about half of the "Number 5" album, some incredibly well-played (for live music) tasty arrangements & a wonderful lack of surfeit of attitude - the man's just layin' it down. Gotta wonder who taped this in Massachusetts at the time & what other recordings were made with this equipment, as overall it sounds great, maybe from the front of a balcony, close up. It appears to be 4am before the last song in the set...gotta wonder who else was on this bill before Steve Miller. I remember those shows, like getting out of Hot Tuna at the Palladium at 6am with the sun coming up, one band, all night...
5. E-ticket functionality dedicated for normal passengers.
Oxen.
In 2000, Chevron became a participant in two major projects in Chad. The first was the development of the Doba oil fields in the south.The second involved the construction and operation of a pipeline to transport oil from those fields to an export terminal facility in Cameroon. Together, they represent one of the largest industrial projects in Africa.
Overall, I was left sadly unsatisfied. I had heard so many brilliant things about The Hunger Games and the following books, that I really wanted to love it. But I just couldn’t connect with it. I felt no connection with the plot or the main characters, Katniss irritated me, and I wanted to know more. I’m not saying that you shouldn’t read The Hunger Games – you should. Every person would approach this book differently, every person’s reading experience would be different.
My neighbor disappeared into his house and has not spoken to me since.
When you have kids it's hard to find time to get away. At times I dread having to go to the store and runnimg various other errands. The idea of dragging around four grumpy little ones leaves me (and most parents out there) shaking in their boots.
We believe that Austin is an ideal location for the new studio. Austin’s combination of dense technology resources and creative arts culture reflects the esthetics of our future technology-driven business strategy. Add to that the excellent Texas School for the Deaf and you have a wonderful environment for CSD to thrive.
Now you get to try again.
Good morning dear crafters. We hope you all had a cracking Easter (sorry couldn’t resist) and ate lots of lovely chocolate. Shame about the weather though, although I’m sure it was a perfect excuse to craft all weekend lol! Before we announce the details of the brand new challenge we would like to say a big thank you for all your gorgeous entries into last week’s “whatever the weather” challenge. There were lots of brilliant creations and Lis will certainly have a tough decision to narrow her favourites down to just 5. Please check back later to find out if you are one of the lucky 5 and also to find out who the lucky winner of the Limited Edition ‘Spring’ Promarkers courtesy of Letraset will be.
How should this affect our reading of the Bible?
I do it again, and then suddenly realize that this can’t be right!
- Jamaal Magloire has the largest shoe size.
Some of our stuff might come in handy.
Well darling,
This photograph shows the memorial to the 38 men and boys who lost their lives in the Montagu View Pit Disaster at Scotswood on March 30th 1925. More information on the disaster here Durham Mining Museum - Montagu View Pit Disaster Report.
We’re in a society that is just too concerned with making others feel better. The “N-Word” is without question inappropriate, but when it comes to history, and learning, clouding the facts, or watering down the facts is wrong. Furthermore, putting shackles like this, around the next generations ankles only makes a bad situation worse. We live in a society that “babies” those that are growing in a feeble attempt at protecting them from wrong, or the ugliness of the world.
So many worries and so many questions that I am sure we all share… It is strange though how I decided to show the world I cared more about my looks than about anything else. I guess I felt I could hide feelings and fears, but how do you hide your looks? How could I act like if I liked what I saw in the mirror? I simply couldn’t. And I stopped appearing into pictures and looking at myself.
And I did enough veggies to have some "Bubble and Squeak" tomorrow....Yum Yum!
I recommend hopping over to Humbug Hall for a look at the lovely creations by Ann, Max and Brenda. They have been having crazy weather while here in the South (that is the US South) we have had the most incredibly beautiful weather. It is making it tough to stay indoors and work or craft. We only have about two weeks every year when you can have the windows open and enjoy the great outdoors (in between it being so hot and humid that you practically drink the air and so chilly and rainy that you want to bundle next to the heater). So, the Wonderkid and I have been having a nice time out of doors. Hopefully you are having more of my weather than the Baltic wing of Humbug Hall.
There have been moments when I've worried that our site is a bit Little Englandy - too parochial, too inwards looking and a bit unfriendly towards foreigners. But that's not the aim. We just want to celebrate the great fiction being written in Britain (not just by Brits either. Some of our best UKYA writers are in fact Americans, but they live here, so that's OK) and redress the balance a bit.
So, that break was shorter than I thought it would be.
I've sort of wanted a Kindle for a while, and lately I've really wanted one. I'm never going to stop buying physical books, ever. But I can only own so many, and a Kindle would be great for reading books I want to read but don't want to own, and also for reading friends' mss.
Of course we are now a King down after the ghost demon killed Renly. Brienne and Cat had to run as obvious suspects for the murder, giving Cat a new guard. Theon despite being baptised is still viewed as an idiot. Note how he became aware of what it would take for most of the Winterfell guard to leave, then later, most of the guard did leave. Oh what is he scheming? Dany had a marriage proposal, then a reason not to accept it. Like the dragons so far
“It is irresponsible and disrespectful when someone bad mouths the other states.
Piper is an intriguing figure, not least because his work is so varied and, it has to be said, uneven. Looking through 'Piper's Places', the book he put together with Richard Ingrams towards the end of his (Piper's) life, I was struck by this. You'd go from a beautifully detailed, atmospheric drawing of a country church to a scribbled sketch of some piece of coastline that had evidently caught his fancy at a particular moment, in a particular light perhaps, or with clouds looming.
How was your weekend and week so far?
I love everything about this shot… her pose, the colors, the angle but most of all, the bright reflection on the window next to her which I purposely wanted to capture. I really love this composition.
YANP: Wednesday, you have James McVinnie. Who did you come to be aware of him and come to getting him for the festival?
Yesterday I took my children to the local mall to grab an ice cream and sit by the fountain. The tranquil sound of the water as it splashed onto itself had my three year old so excited that he tried numerous attempts to get in there. Finally, my husband and I were able to satiate him by offering him a penny. I have three children, two pennies and a dime. I explained that he should wish really hard and throw it in.
I love this very cute stamps and I guess my cards most of the time is very cute. But I really love making cards for men/boys, then it can be really messy on my craftspace.
Novelist Zadie Smith, in a recent essay, also sees Brod as misunderstanding the author he saved. “The problem is not solely Brod’s flat-footed interpretations, it’s his interventions in the texts themselves.” Brod, she argues, arranged and organized many of Kafka’s texts, with his own biases, issues and values in mind.
1) the high rate of divorces in my sales region: this article cites one boss who measures productivity in the divorce rate. When I realized that almost everyone in my sales region was divorced, it became more clear to me that I could not stay at this company. I was the youngest sales person in my group, but wise enough to realize that my marriage was more important than any job.
What we lack now is not good laws but good implementation with integrity.
Needless to say, many people were skeptical (to put it mildly) of this venture (see, for instance, the comments thread on my post), especially since there were so few details of the literary agency's inner workings, apart from a bunch of agents with no last names (here's Agent Emily). What would PA do to earn the $199 fee? Would they be marketing new manuscripts, their own books, or both? Would they even send out submissions at all?
We want to give hugs to whales who have been confined to a bath tub for 28 years while being forced to jump through hula hoops for food. We want to believe he's happy and he's down with being couped up. We've lost sight of reality. Common sense says he's rather be with his pod cruising the ocean. We want to believe the elephants are thrilled to be performing under the big tent. We want to believe our dogs are almost human and would never eat a goat.
Dad & I had brunch at Insalata's in San Anselmo. It had been too long since I'd been to this place with such inventive and delicious dishes. It was the first time to try their brunch, and although a good time for breakfast dishes, we felt more like having the lunch items.
HENRY JAGLOM: Completely. But, more importantly, let me tell you this about Orson on that film. I had some problems shooting that film. I was having trouble with the crew. I'd select a certain camera set up, and the crew would argue with me, saying that if we shot the film this or that way it wouldn't cut. So I told Orson this, and he simply told me, 'Tell them it's a dream sequence.' So I did that, and the crew starts to fall over themselves to help me. I haven't shot a film since, were I haven't had an issue with a crew member in regards to shooting. And every time something like that happens, I tell them it's a dream sequence. And it works. Orson was right. He understood how people worked. He told me to tell them it was a dream sequence cause he understood that people are very used to working in method and structure. So by telling them it was to be a dream sequence he understood that it would free that person up to be creative, cause they associate dreams with something unreal, where everything is possible.
But the third heaven is the abode of God and according to Ephesians 1:3, the blessings of heaven are spiritual, rather than physical. In Philippians 2:10 we see the distinction of the two and I read, “That at the name of Jesus every knee shall bow, of things in heaven, and things in earth.” This is also seen in Ephesians 1:10 where it is foretold that “in the dispensation of the fullness of times, he might gather together in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth, even in him.”
In many ways, Wolf’s input actually freshened up some work which has become slightly over-familiar, and gave extra emotional heft to shots that no longer seem so shocking or transgressive (though Goldin defiantly kept in the picture of two young girls that caused huge controversy last year). The Englishness of a folky song like Wolf’s Tristan somehow found a connection in these quintessentially New York pictures, and spoke eloquently of a connection between the denizens of the Lower East Side – now lost to drugs, Aids or gentrification – and London’s young generation of artists and club kids. Thanks to some enterprising soul with a camera, you can see Saturday’s show (in black and white) on YouTube here.
and taking time for myself.
The other day, because of the stupid snow in DC, I spent 25 hours without power in my apartment and probably the only thing that kept me sane was that my friend, P Dawg, spent like 13 of those hours with me (as his power was out as well, because he lives in my apartment complex). You can imagine that in a span of 13 hours, we had the chance to talk about a lot of things… one of those being the guys I’m dating right now.
On the question of Bidayuhs’ “disunity”, Nuek said: “I think one of the reasons the Bidayuhs are in this political situation now is their lack of knowledge of politics. It’s just like the Ibans.
Despite what is said of the Crusades, they were a campaign to reclaim the holy land from Muslims who had conquered it and they were led by men who knowingly bankrupted themselves and often died in this cause. Though Christianity had been widely observed in the East, the armies of Islam destroyed all but remnants, thus shifting its survival to Europe in the West.
I’m thrilled to have seen that magical #81 on the page containing my novel, along with my first review – completely unsolicited I assure you! Nevertheless it was a humdinger … straight in with a 5 star review, and some fantastic comments:
Family members say they have witnesses who saw Mbatsha being beaten up by the police's Technical Response Team.
After about twenty minutes on the bike my body is in a full sweat. A cleansing sweat. If my legs are going too fast it means the resistance level is too easy. I need to crank it up. I need to feel just a bit of burn. If doesn't take some mental effort, it's not worth it. It's not making me strong. I think about the rhythm of the song in my ears. I match the up and down of my legs with the beat of the music.
Today I have my third post as the Flourishes Limelight Designer to share with you! My card is inspired by an image of a decorated room that I found while searching in google images. If you want to see the inpsiration photo, please go to my Inspired by a Room post on the Flourishes blog. The photo is fabulous, and is very close to what I want our room to look like when I am done decorating it! Here is my card!
Really, I want to have the logic (an invocation of AntBuilder with a bunch of classpath and environment setup) in the script, as its used for more than just the compilation, its also used for running the GWT client and other tasks.
In another study, scientists Giuseppe Pagoni and Milos Cekic, from the Department of Psychiatry and Behavioral Sciences at Emory University in Atlanta, compared the volume of gray matter in the brains of people performing Zen meditations with another group who were not meditators.
Most viewers are not like me, their ears are not attuned to what is not said, and they will bother to check the truth, or otherwise, of what they are being told, and that is what liars like the BBC depend on.
Vacation rentals provide many amenities than majority of hotels do. Vacation rentals tend to give full kitchens and multiple bedrooms. Many vacation rentals (holiday homes or villa) also allow pets. Pet owners can bring their pets for vacation which can make their trip more enjoyable. Do ensure that you check on the place’s pet policy before hand, though, since each owner sets his or her own rules.
This response is multiply confused. First, each universe in the ensemble is not simple but is characterized by a multiplicity of independent constants and quantities. If each universe were simple, then why did Dawkins feel the need to recur to the hypothesis of a World Ensemble in the first place? Besides, the issue is not the simplicity of the fundamental laws, for all the universes in the ensemble are characterized by the same laws—where they differ is in the values of the constants and quantities.
Basically everybody knows what to expect here that can be seen in plenty of other Nicholas Spark’s adaptations that have come out in recent years such as ‘Message in a Bottle’, ‘The Notebook’, ‘Dear John’, ‘The Last Song’, and plenty others. All of those (with the exception of one, I’ll let you guess which one) are very bad and pretty much the same exact thing. This is another one that can be added to that stupid list that needs to go away and go now!
"God? Please! You are nothing but an ant compared to I."
This piece is done in black and clear and as we talked about other options I had a brain wave… I have now commissioned a piece for my brother’s 50th birthday. She will make a piece in the ‘next size up’ – with silvered ‘leading’ glass ‘dew-drops’ and a beechwood frame. I have chosen a different font for the lettering. All very exciting. I have never commissioned anything of this nature before.
All KrystalKraft acrylic shapes have now been sold out and discontinued and I am working on removing that page link from all sections.
My dear husband was at home with the kids these five days and trying to work and juggle schedules, etc. He was anxious for me to come home, so on Tuesday night at about 8:30, I left Provo for my trek home. It was late to be leaving, tired as I was, but I didn't want to stress D out any more than he was. As I was driving, my tears, held together most of the day, were bursting to come out. But to drive safely, I couldn't let them come.
And I fell, nearly found myself at Death’s door
LDL - 82
Both Len McCluskey, general secretary of the Unite union and Dave Prentis, general secretary of Unison gave support to Miliband. But Prentis received a standing ovation when he demanded that Labour should support the strikes if they went ahead.
I was confused, because she's seen my new lounging-around outfit before.
Midnight.
The Amazing Race – Still going strong after all these years, although I have to admit it’s getting a little tired. At least with Survivor the contestants can find new ways to play the game but with The Amazing Race you’re always going to be watching some divorced couple race through an airport alongside some pretty couple, and a pair of chubby best friends on their way to do some random challenge where they have to find an envelope hidden within one of a thousand Ming vases they have to smash over their partners head in order to look inside.
www.sluggerotoole.com/2007/05/14/what-about-all-those-dual-mandates
Notice here - that I do not say "feminists", "feminuts", or "feminasties".
Then bend me over before I can reply,
5. San Francisco – Ingrid Michaelson
I hate farm-ins too. For a start, we all know that the client is paying way more than the amount we'd charge for the job. Boston Coach will be charging big-city corporate rates; we're a small town, small business operation, with rates commensurate. It kinda bugs knowing that I am the least paid person in the chain, but the one taking all the shit.
Mark Derby / An Interview and an Essay / 133
10. One of many great songs put to good use on the "Dazed and Confused" soundtrack.
And all that we suffered through having existed
The Vienna Boys Choir
“We said our hellos, like I said. Then we took a stroll through the department store because she said she’d like to do something else.
P.S I will be busy next week as I have a wedding to attend.
The pension systems for Phoenix and Arizona employees are unrelated but the same rules generally apply to both.
Capitalism is amoral because it is an economic theory. Marxism has a morality because it is a religion.
Math: Rod & Staff 5
She stops shakes her head no then tells me how I have a very big dick
Food coloring, optional
The prize for the random winner will be 4 images of the winners choice.
Voice: Michel Angelo could.
For the past few years New Balance has been advertising that they make some of their shoes in the US and some are made in the US with all US materials. I like the idea of supporting local businesses and New Balance is based in Brighton Mass. So when I needed a new pair of shoes I thought I would give them a try and went to their outlet store in Brighton, MA which is in the head quarters complex there.
It’s that time of year again! Time to celebrate Latin American Arts in Canada with the 2010 Allende Arts Festival in Toronto from September 10th-25th
ROM 1:6 Among whom are ye also the called of Jesus Christ:
I listened to the phone ring. No way was I going to answer it. I sounded (and still sound like a croaking frog)
3. Across The Borderline 5'09
11. Hallowe'en, Hallowe'en - Oscar Brand & His Young Friends
“Just think, dear, I’m sure you will remember if you try.”
Chav Harry turned to his band of rocker brothers before continuing,
Into this mix comes a young journalist from Tennessee, Carl Jenkins, who knows this land and its people, and is shocked by the way the experts are covering the trial. Yet he is not immune. When his newspaper wants more "oomph" to his stories, he hits on the idea of bringing his young relative, Nora Bonesteel, to town. She has the "sight", and maybe she will "see" the truth and help him with his stories. Of course, she can't, because, as she tells Carl, "it doesn't work that way".
The crazy thing is that the exact month we got pregnant two years ago is the exact same month we got pregnant this year. It was a much needed blessing and we were so shocked at the timing of it all. I was three days late and sitting in church trying not to cry. I was going through what I thought were menstral cramps and I just didn't know how many more months I could take it. Not just not being pregant, but starting late every month and getting my hopes up that it might finally be our good month. Well the unexpexted happend! WhenI didn't start I had greg go to the store and buy a test. I really had him do this just so I could see the "not pregnant" and at least know that I could move on to another month without stressing about not starting on time. Greg went up stairs to do something and when I started to see the test turn positive I was seriously hysterical. I was yelling at Greg to "come quick!!!" The state thatI was in made him think that I wasn't pregnant. I then proceeded to show him and said honey.."were finally pregnant!" He held me so close and we just cried and cried together. It just did not feel real. It still kind of doesn't but my HCG levels continued to double and we got to see our little blueberry and the heart beat and I just can't express that gratitude that I have towards my Heavenly father at this time. We have gone through so many struggles at bringing a child into this life. From cysts, to chronic inovuation, high prolactin, a supposed tumor, surguries, and even kidney stones. I would do it all again!
(If you’ve ever been in front of a charging angry buffalo, you might understand the power there. Yellowstone National Park can offer you that experience. A must do. Gain some perspective.)
Germs are released through tears and the stitching of standard NHS pillows when pressure is applied – for example when a patient lays their head down, it added.
Then secondly a flat plate shape is formed into the vane, this is the equivalent of the Linear dampers damping rod. This arm needs to be a close fit to the damper cavity in order to accurately control oil for the damping effect. It’s the edges of this arm that need to be sealed against the housing. A single square edged seal is fitted into a machined groove around the periphery of the vane. There are also four friction reducing pads (two on each side) to aid the movement of the vane against the body.
Look to her work for inspiration that brings a unique and whimsy feel to any event or space. Her talent for creating movement and emotion will certainly impress you, as it did for me. I recommend you check out all her work and maybe even send a little “hello, you rock”. You can read more about her process and the latest news on her blog and don’t forget to like her Facebook page too.
Other info:
Fernando Sanchez, fashion designer, Upper East Side
I do love bees, I think there's something quite magical about them. And bee-rescuing is a popular past-time in our house. They inevitably end up in the swimming pool, so it's out with the honey, lots of warm breath on very frail bee bodies (sort of mouth to mouth resuscitation...) and a bit of sunshine - and then it's such a joy when they revive and fly away.
If anyone of you know anything about me, you all know that my obsession with Library Science began when I was a small kid. My biggest heroines were librarians—no matter how mean people thought that they were or no matter how withdrawn some seemed at the time. I always wanted to be a Librarian and the spirit of Librarianism has been inside of me since I first picked up a book.
The hours steal slowly on, as the homeless and hopeless unfortunate clutches her thin tattered shawl around her attenuated frame, and staggers miserably onward; or crouches from the ruffian violence of the cowardly bully, who, with bloodshot eyes and livid features, sallies forth in quest of mischief. Here prowl two little urchins, young in years, but fearfully old in crime. Lo! they have suddenly disappeared – no there they are, slinking in the gloomy shade of the butcher's shop door, until that vigilant Police constable Lynx eye, shall have passed. There rises the tall skeleton form of the fire escape, and in front of the sentry box stands the brave, fearless man who has rescued so many lives from the fearful doom with which they were threatened. In olden times he would have been crowned with laurel, and honoured by the State; but now well, he, is only a poor fire escape attendant, so let him stand on the pavement, and gaze at the dull crimson light in the horizon which betokens a distant fire.
My day started out in a panic. I get up for work at 6:30 a.m. This morning I woke up at 7:48 a.m. I am usually brewing coffee at work at that time! I called my boss, rushed to get ready and I actually got here in record time. When I arrived, I let me boss know I was here and he said "I don't think you have ever been late" and there was one other time but this is only the 2nd time in 8 years. Pretty good track record I'd say.
remember
I lived in the UK for three years, and when I returned home, there were two things that I missed in particular. Obviously the first (and most important) were shoes. Every colour, size and shape conceivable. I miss that. The second thing I really missed, and often thought about importing as it felt like there was such an obvious gap in our market, was a wide range of stylish and unique gift cards. Luckily for us Yvonne Morrison has brought them to the country. This, however, isn’t the only thing she does. As well as looking after her two little ones, she also runs an on-demand accounts assistance business. Another one of our super multi-taskers!
DE: A transient by-product of good writing, good company and good sex.
Double/Triple IPA's
It could be argued that there's a correlation between the number of mass-produced and faddish accessories, the owner's aspirations and the suspension of disbelief with regard to marketing. Fads make fools of us: witness the dominance of the so-called Belgian style - the greyest of styles deriving from the antique shops of Axel Vervoordt and other Brabantse antiquairs and decorators and now devolved via trend-driven decorating magazines to mall and catalogue. The style could be Belgian, French Provincial, Gustavian, English country house - the name doesn't matter. What matters is that we keep on buying the furniture store vignette (remember that annoying tune "buy the room, get the ....") much as we might buy an outfit put together by a clothing store clerk. That's what matters.
So I’ve taken multimedia writing courses, essay writing, literary fiction and nonfiction, critical (reading and) writing, travel and business writing, magazine article writing, and research paper writing. And you know what I’ve learned? That I’m a better writer for it. And that I definitely have a lot more to learn. ~ cs
I racked my brain for the latest tussle doing the rounds these days…shit!! There were too many issues!!
Contents: Road Test: Husqvarna 500 WR and 500 XC; Special Features: Eye on ’84 – the view from Westlake village; Honda Preview; Kawasaki Preview; Yamaha Preview; Harley Preview; Can-Am Preview; Husqvarna Preview; K100 – BMW’s Four-Cylinder Future; Features: Braking – four riders try panic stops with some amazine results; Messenger in red – Ducati TT2 600; Technical: Chassis & Suspension part 3; more
The creature gets only one attack this round. It swings at Ahmet with its one tentacle as it sweeps to its right, missing. Seth alone takes incidental damage: 2 points, not enough to stun him.
Hubby: What did you get at the grocery store?
5. Earth burgers, black bean BBQ burgers, PB & J burgers, bacon and egg burgers, and chicken salad sammy
The trouble is, I know a lot more about Romney than he's telling me in this speech.
Life's too short, as a friend recently remarked to me. Life is too short for me to shuffle around like a ninety year old. I'm going to go out there and grab life by the tail.
~Being alert to sharing God's love in every situation.
Opinions like his bring about terrible advice for women, like this hideously insulting article on CNBC.com. I’ll summarize it here to spare you the agony of reading. Dear women, stop talking, stop wanting attention and stop having your own friends. Basically, just throw your feelings in a trash can. They’re useless. Men don’t care about how you feel and they don’t want to talk about how they feel.
But it’s not just food that you can save on and stay healthy, you can with your fitness too!
So what did I learn I hear you all ask??! I learnt about SEO, Search Engine Optimisation (you should be VERY impressed at this point!). I learnt some great little hints and tips from the lovely Lee Smallwood as well as information from the Red Rocket about going self hosted. As for the follow and no follow link debate, I am still a bit lost. I haven’t done any sponsored posts so am guessing I don’t really need to worry too much and I think I may have got my head around it all just about, it did take the lovely Kylie from Not Even and Bag of Sugar a LOT of explaining to get me there, but it paid off and I get it………just about (I think!!).
As it happens, all but four of those musicians are men, and all of them are white. Should this concern us?
But don't hold your breath, I know how these things work, I bet I'll come back, sit down and won't get it again. lol
“Depart from me, ye cursed, into everlasting fire, prepared for the devil and his angels.”
They had all spent the night in a tent on site to guard the raft and watch the spectacle that must have been the other competition. I know that they told some stories about not “sleeping a wink” and “strangers stumbling into wrong tents” -- and other tales of a less than quiet night. Perhaps another reason why my parents thought it better than I spend the night at home. *grins*
For the weather-measuring folk here is a module with temperatures and humidity. Using the popular DHT22 sensor module the temperature range is -4°C to +125°C with an accuracy of +/- 0.5°C, and humidity with an accuracy of between two and five percent. Only one digital input pin is required, and the board is clearly labelled:
On Saturday, I went to visit my sister at the nursing home in Butler, only to find that she was out for the day to celebrate New Years’ eve with her family. So I had a very pleasant visit with my aunt who is also a resident there. I stopped in to visit a new friend, who turned 100 years old last November. She is such a delight to visit, always upbeat and pleasant. She is just the type of person I want to be when I get OLD! Before Christmas I took her several Christmas cookies. She made me promise to come back, bring some more and eat them with her! One day she said to me, “Oh, you are so pretty”! This was music to my ears but then I realized she doesn’t hear nor SEE well. When I mentioned this fact to her she insisted that she could see that well! Memories like these create many Magic Moments in my life.
Take children, for instance; I have three of them – two are easy going, one is more challenging. I dread to think what I would have been like if I'd only had the two easy ones. I'd have felt very superior about my obvious parenting skills. But the challenging one whispers to my conscience 'parenting skills be blowed – happy, easy kids are just luck'. Thus he keeps me on my toes and makes me a nicer human being, although not always, it has to be said, when he is in the middle of being challenging.
On a morning sometime in the 1970s, said friend was eating his croissant fifteen minutes prior to the store's opening in the morning at the health food store he was managing in Queens. Being the seasoned retailer that he was, he had established a firm rule of eating before opening. On this occasion, a woman with an unusual sense of urgency appeared banging at the door, insisting she be let in before the official opening hour. I don't recall the specific reason, but she added fuel to her plea with the statement: "But I came all the way from Bayside, Queens." This refrain was repeated ad nauseum emphasizing the words "all the way from Bayside, Queens." My friend's response was, "I don't care where you come from, lady, I am finishing my croissant and I am not opening this door before 9 AM." The war across the pane of glass continued and, as you might expect, the door was not open until 9 AM.
On the other side, the people who were in-charge of the Stella Maris and Media where so ridiculously stupid and ignorant (about law) allowed to capture the footage of, to whom he voted and telecast-ed. Its not just about getting into someones personal things, its also a punishable criminal offence.
Well, I hope whomever reads this, it finds you well. It’s 11:46pm, and I am heading home. Konichiwa………………………………………………..b****es. ;-)
High Performance Landscape Guidelines is the first document of its kind in the nation: a comprehensive, municipal design primer for sustainable parks and open space. The product of a unique partnership between the Parks Department and the Design Trust, a nonprofit organization that helped create sustainable guidelines for NYC buildings, High Performance Landscape Guidelines covers every aspect of creating sustainable parks, from design to construction to maintenance, and feature many best practices for managing soil, water, and vegetation resources.
We spend a lot of time at work. For many people, gone are the days of the 40 hour work week. A “high conflict work environment” often increases the conflict for a person who spends excessive amounts of time there. Some work environments are higher in conflict than others, and this often results in an increase in negative effects on people. These negative effects can be detrimental both psychologically and mentally. When this occurs, it becomes that much more important to learn how to separate our professional life from our personal life. Because many people struggle with this, they have difficulty compartmentalizing their life. In other words, they struggle with putting the different aspects of their life in compartments in an attempt to decrease the effects of working in a high conflict environment.
proposition, it's her voice. For some it's swoonily intense,
ETA: Richard just posted a story called "Barbeque the Sink Beast" at Flywheel Magazine. This is not for the faint of heart... or stomach. But it's freakin' hilarious. Read if you dare here.
4. It is time for Julius Malema to admit that the only real genocide in South Africa was the Koi annihilation by his ancestors and what Shaka and Dingaan did to their own people. Today, once more, South Africans are wiping fellow citizens off the face of the earth.
In terms of the food the menu has a number of veggie choices. Between us the DC and I had two different pasta dishes, one arrabbiata (a touch to salty) and one siciliana (came covered in an unexpected cheese sauce, which somewhat spoiled the dish). And also two Shirley Temple non-alcoholic cocktails (it seemed rude not in the circumstances) a combination of sprite, lime and grenadine – these were excellent. All in all the bill came to 85 ringgit – expensive compared to some of the other places in town, but this is somewhere you can be a bit surer of having something veggie.
Tears. Tears. Tears.
In our first year of brewing, we brewed 1,300 barrels of beer. By 2011, that number has jumped up to 175,000 barrels.
We bless you Lord.
I have been sitting in this question the last few days as I let go of soul contracts that no longer work for me. Even though I don’t know exactly what this looks like, I trusted my guides to work with me, and through me, on this matter.
Does this mean that you’ll never sleep with me again?
Action Comics #8
feeling cold...a light coat in Chicago is definitely different than a light coat in NC.
In conclusion, her progression and numbers are good and animal crackers make everything better.
However, Stephen Laiche, one of two attorneys who defended Dewey at 1996 trial, praised Mesa County District Attorney Pete Hautzinger’s office, The Daily Sentinel reported.
Why American men should boycott American women
Ah yes, management.
It is a blistering hot June evening and I am stuck in a traffic jam, retrieving my dad from his latest escapade after receiving a call from the police with his whereabouts. My dad is in the mid-stages of Alzheimer’s disease. He has a knack of finding ways to sneak out of his board and care facility, hitchhike with strangers, and end up in unusual places. Today, it is a Wal-Mart, thirty minutes away.
Two hopeful hearts, two lands apart, together there’s no end to what our dream can start. –Pocahontas (Pocahontas II)
Without sitting down and really going over some cool combinations with Fadi, it’s pretty hard to plan out my doubles army. I can, however, work on my singles force.
Summary: A brief note looking behind the headlines, at a major discovery. Insights about politics can change the destiny of nations as much or more than those about science.
Everyone at Rickety Bridge
If travel is to the west, going to bed and waking up later than usual can help the body start to adjust to the upcoming time change. More specific recommendations are available as of 2002, tailored to whether the person is traveling through six time zones, 7–9 zones, or 10 or more.
So prominent was the fruitiness, and so unlike a normal Belgian brune, that I half suspected that it wasn't how it was supposed to taste, but it didn't matter, it was the best tasting beer I've had in an Irish pub for yonks.
Hi all. I had planned to post WiP updates throughout the HoA project, but illness intervened. Suffice to say the models were all finished in time, and I'm back on my feet, alive and well. Unfortunately, I had to drop the superheavy plans, but I had no choice given the deadline constraints and time spent in the hospital instead of at the workbench. Alas...
As I was saying this the thought came into my mind, 'How is Micah going to experience these pains?' You see I want to protect him but I also do not want him to be numb to God because he has never experience pain in immense quantities. Sure he has had to deal with me and Shanna’s mistakes as parents but for the most part he has been sheltered.
Cupid/heart: I bought many years ago at a local Hypermarket
Nurse: Zero ici (Her swirling her hands over my boob area)
His Beatitude, Metropolitan Jonah, presided at the consecration Divine Liturgy. Concelebrating were His Eminence, Archbishop Nathaniel; His Grace, Bishop Nikon; His Grace, Bishop Tikhon; His Grace, Bishop Benjamin; His Grace, Bishop Melchisedek, who served as Locum Tenens of the diocese; His Grace, Bishop Michael; His Grace, Bishop Matthias; His Grace, Bishop Irineu; His Grace, Bishop Mark; and His Grace, Bishop Irenee.
This blogging one time a week is for the birds. I don't know why I'm not doing it more often, it's not like I don't have things to say. I think about updating, and then next thing I know a week's gone by.
Matthew 6:31-33: “Therefore do not be anxious, saying, ‘What shall we eat?’ or ‘What shall we drink?’ or ‘What shall we wear?’ For the Gentiles seek after all these things, and your heavenly Father knows that you need them all. But seek first the kingdom of God and his righteousness, and all these things will be added to you.”
SHAH ALAM, Feb 22 — Tun Dr Mahathir Mohamad labelled all Malaysians “racists” today when responding to accusations against Barisan Nasional (BN) leaders for playing the race card when lobbying for Malay and Chinese support.
The man in the brown suit pulled hard on me. I saw the still-framed world outside vignetted by the door frame. And then it disappeared with a slam. The door locked on it’s own. I was spun around and sat down in my chair, across from the already seated stranger.
Let cook on medium high for several minutes until browned and "sticking" together. Cut into sections, flip.
Magnolia bark and root are also used occasionally in Western herbalism, although they are not major healing herbs. At one time, magnolia root was used to treat rheumatism, and was thought to be superior to quinine in treating chills and fever.
Here is how Groovy Mums started. It is really special to see how such a simple idea has led to so much over the last 6 months culminating in the #groovymums party trending on Twitter. Having said that, seeing the personal changes the current Groovy Mums have made has being truly inspirational.
And I would gladly like to have those fur hats and the crazy green boots!
‘You must remember. You must. I remember her arms too. It’s perfectly true. They only came down a little below where they should be and they were supposed to be flattish, but you never really saw them because she wore big sleeves, big full ones, and I think they were sewn up at the ends. But they looked flattish, like flippers, and she held them against her sides or across her chest and she moved them rather awkwardly. But you could never see her legs. We always wanted to. We wanted to see her in the bath and of course we couldn’t, and it was terrible. I remember, never being able to know, and of course we couldn’t ask her or anyone else really – anyway we couldn’t get proper answers from anyone. And, you see, she was always in the same kind of dress – a long, long grey shiny dress, silk I think, that fastened at the neck with a close collar and came right down to the ground and hid everything.
The central change here is that now sufficient evidence is required, rather than “complete” evidence. The difference could become a significant one at court in the future.
To all my SMAns, you followed me, now please follow all of my friends.
If you look closely at the color wheel, you’ll notice that the complement of each primary color is the combination of the other two primary colors. This means that:
Keep a small plate to ready to spread.
Mother Jones passed away today in 1930. Jones was a famous labor organizer.
to imagine himself turning into hydrogen.
Can't wait to get my box of goodies and start playing
1.our aim being to extract as much cash as possible from you in order to increase our average spend per head,thus ultimately improving our GP,we would consider it far more polite if the whole table were to partake of a starter.
I had noted this a couple of months ago and tried to address this, featuring beers by Newmans, Purple Moose, Jacobi and Wye Valley.
Whilst one gets used to the sight of machine guns around here, this one is being carried even more nonchalantly then your average Kurdish firearm.
All of the card stock, patterned paper, and even the sentiment tag are a part of the Peachy Picks Kit. The cute little gnome was stamped with Memento Tuxedo Black ink and colored with Copic markers. The pearl trim and the brads on the sign are the only elements that weren't part of the wonderful kit this month. It's so much fun choosing what to use for a card from all the fabulous things that are included in each kit. If you haven't figured it out by now, I am LOVING these kits!! Give them a try, because I know you will, too!!
Good gravy, do I love the taste and texture of roasted potatoes! They bring me back to Sunday dinners of yore and good times spent with family. This dish could be your meat-free answer to traditional Thanksgiving fare, or it could be enjoyed throughout the winter months with plenty of gravy. What follows is not a recipe per se, but more a list of possible ingredients and a method. I am partial to mushrooms and tofu together, but you may decide against it or even swap out the tofu for beans.
17 GOLFER Tiger Woods is the world's highest-paid sportsman, earning £44million a year, including £30,000 a day for wearing Nike caps - which Thai workers get £2.20 a day to make.
But this morning, for whatever reason, his oxygenation levels were fluctuating. Some of the time he was high, 96 or 98 percent, and other times he was low, even into the high seventies. This worries May. Everything worries May, to be true, but this came after yesterday’s drop
Have an "egg-cellent" week!
But the pulp chips didn’t really start flying till Chabon’s The Adventures of Kavalier and Clay grabbed the Pulitzer in 2000. In the decade that followed, I count at least two dozen literary works firmly planted in genre soil originally deforested by pulp fiction nearly a century ago. All by authors of high literary pruning. In addition to the perennial Atwood and Chabon, add Philip Roth, Michael Cunningham, Isabel Allende, Sherman Alexie, Jane Smiley, Jonathan Lethem, Tom De Haven, Cormac McCarthy, Kazuo Ishiguro, David Mitchell, Kevin Brockmeier, and Caryl Churchill.
Wow! Jesus Culture played the Verizon Center in Dallas tonight and, well, wow! It wasn’t just about the band, the music, the lights. It was about how ever many thousands of people were there, hands raised, ready to worship our risen savior.
Strange the way the world works sometimes. Have a great day, keep well...
And whisper in her ear
What I will highlight below is just a sampling of the errors and sleight of hand deployed by Bob Sungenis in the defense of his neo-geocentrism. I hope you’ll begin to see the patterns so you can more easily spot these ploys if you run across them in his writings again. Just ask yourself this question. Is this someone who is really just “In this for the truth”, or is this someone who will say anything in order to win an argument?
Ana was a great character at first. She came from a life of neglect and hardship that gave her a slim core of strength and resilience. It was just, through the progression of the story, her strength dimmed and she became kind of tiresome. I liked the concept of music throughout the story, but I'm on the fence about if I like how it bound Ana and Sam together. Sam was a bit too generic for me. Something about him just didn't work. Ana's obsession with him didn't quite work either, but at least I knew where she was coming from. It was as if Ana went from strong young woman seeking her roots to pitiful child in love.
Lear, is a re-working of Shakespeare's through Marx's explanation of the historical process. It has the customary excessive violence which is horrific torture of Lear who is left blind after his eyeballs are extracted by a machine (Bond was a a materialist), to make a symbolic gesture of starting to take the great wall that he had built as king between his people and their neighbours which dominated the play. His sufferings by the middle act of he play lead him to an awareness of man as a trapped and degraded creature imprisoned in the reality formed by the ideology and institutions of the society over which he was once king:
I was a little unsure of what to make with leather. I have never worked with it before. Then I saw my Sharp Crochet Hook and *ding*...I thought I'd try crocheting through leather and what do ya know? It worked! I am loving how this cuff came out and hope you do too!
Have you ever heard an instrument play by itself or found the same objects day after day? This is also considered a visitation. The spirits are said to be able to manipulate electronics more easily. Often this would seem to be a way of allowing the living to know that the spirit of someone is still around even though we may not know whom. There are psychics who believe this is the way some spirits visit the world of the living.
Actually it's team penning practice, but. . . yey!
"Life was like a box of chocolates...you never know what you' re gonna get" a famous line by Forrest Gump. Did you know he said that in 1994? Not trying to make you feel old - or make myself feel old. I just can't believe how long it has been. I think that quote is so true! No matter what you get you have got to make the best of it and decide to be happy!
She abandoned her two bright white eggs to their lonely fate
But it gets even more complicated, because the groundswell of the press and the people say it is so. Apparently the mystique of the Coliseum is gone. Besides the fact that Arash Markazi is viewed – however unfair it might be – as a Judas by the USC faithful, this article is extremely confused. The mystique of the Coliseum wasn’t the perceived invincibility of the Trojans on their own field, it was how the hell USC fans managed to get over their collective yawning for a few years and turn the place into a semblance of home field advantage. In that respect the mystique is gone: attendance figures are falling and will continue to fall until USC is ranked in the top ten with consistency. But then there’s this: that was the loudest Coliseum crowd I’ve heard in a long time. Ignoring the epic failures of the spirit squad’s contemptible mouse squeaks for chanting, it was a pretty good night crowd-wise. When USC exploded at the beginning of the second half and took the lead I overcame my usual attempts at civility and screamed “Choke! Choke!” at the Oregon fans behind me, then pointed at the silent away crowd in the southeastern end of the Coliseum and screamed, “It’s OK, they’re choking too!” This is very rare, and like all prodigies it foreshadowed events of great happenstance and stature, i.e. silent, glowering hatred and despair when the Ducks decided they were dangerously close to seriously messing up their points per game. Still, I was proud of the 88,000 or so fans who managed to show up and, even more surprisingly, wear red. There is still some shard of that pride left. And it was pretty cool to see the student section forget its apathy and rock out, even if it was to the way overplayed instrumental of Seven Nation Army.
or watch a squirrel crack a seed.
Let’s show them that we truly are the intelligent, intellectual Rakyat of Malaysia.
The previous study reported on earlier this week found that hormone use appeared to double the relative risk of dying from breast cancer. In the new study, 25 women among those taking the hormones died from breast cancer, compared with 12 among those who took a placebo. The increased risk translates into 2.6 vs. 1.3 deaths from breast cancer each year for every 10,000 women taking hormones, or about 1.3 additional deaths, the study found.
our auras
displacing saggy neck cream.
I think that we are all in need in a bit of cheer on a cold weekend so here at last is my long-promised giveaway.
Generalisations would be:
We did get our house cleaned this weekend. And Gary was such a sweetheart--he even washed off our outdoor furniture, so we could sit outside if we wanted to. The weather is now nice enough to do just that.
The Media Kidocracy Konference aims to establish critical awareness and understandings amongst young people by exposing youth to information and experiences that will enable them to identify issues they feel are relevant as well as explore the role of the media in creating an understanding of the social issue.
You know she’s waiting,
and all it took was one degree
Haha, I didn't believe him. I didn't believe the test either, frankly! Just too much to take in all at once when something you've wanted so badly for so long has finally happened by a MIRACLE.
Kendra
China avoided that recession by flooding its economy with cheap credit — but that credit has mainly gone into financing the biggest property and infrastructure-building boom of all time. Such booms always end in a crash, but this time, we are told, will be different.
“For the first time in Australia’s history people with significant and permanent disability will receive lifetime care and support, regardless of how they acquired their disability.”
Fly.co.uk provides you with real-time prices and availability, meaning were providing you with the best, up-to-date deals. The price you see on screen includes government taxes and airport fees, enabling you to quickly find the flight that best fits your needs.
Click the link below to view video:
13. The adverse effects, disastrous consequences, serious injury and irreparable damage of this continued trend of deforestation to the plaintiff minor’s generation and to generations yet unborn are evident and incontrovertible. As a matter of fact, the environmental damages enumerated in paragraph 6 hereof are already being felt, experienced and suffered by the generation of plaintiff adults.
Ch – chain
Greenfingers lent down and patted his tired and dirty dog on his head.
So come on California. I don't think anyone would begrudge anyone else a hand now and then, but there is a financial crisis going on. Take some basic steps to ensure benefit recipients buy food, not wine and party supplies.
Monday April 9th 2012, at the
it only lasted a minute because I was so happy
message Pastor Chris Oyakhilome preached on speaking in tongues and he began to
In most states, there are laws regarding the transportation of open bottles of alcoholic beverages in the passenger compartment of a vehicle. To avoid any trouble, be sure to stow in leftovers in the trunk or if there is no trunk, as far away from the passenger area as possible.
Hospital midwives are able to provide care for the group of women booked in their caseload, with structured 'backup' processes from other midwives in the program, and arrangements for handing over care if a labour is very long. These midwives value their employment contracts, through which they have a reliable income, employment benefits such as sick leave and long service leave, and their relationship with their clients is separate from their ability to earn a living.
least opened my eyes to other possibilities for if this stuff
I don’t think we would be no worse off without the royals not one bit tourism would not fall and it would just be one less tax that the British public has to fork out each year. People will argue and give various different reasons such as the land they own gives us money so what? If they were removed it would become our land and there would be nothing they could do about it. I’m not un patriotic I just think they have more flaws than uses and to me they do not represent my country they have a couple of advantages but that’s just it a couple!! Anyway thats my rant over lol feel free to express your opinions peace out people see ya soon!
The counter where the sink goes I arranged my wood planks in the order that I wanted them but upside down in the driveway. I numbered the planks 1-3 and the right and left side of each plank. Remember that since the wood is already upside down to mark the left side of the planks as right.
reading about or how involved they are in urban culture. Readers of this webpage may have the same views or different views of that being presented; the view of the reader just
You have "freedom of speech and expression," yes. But for those who identify with the majority culture, you have most of those freedoms because of a system of privileges afforded to you simply because of the color of your skin and your position in society. You can turn on a tv, open a magazine, walk down the street, and see millions of images that reflect and affirm your life, your culture, and others like you. Native people don't have such a privilege. The only images and representations we see are those created by outside forces, most of which, like your company, are stereotypes that don't reflect or affirm the true nature of our cultures at all.
I have added garlic and Chinese Wine to this recipe, so if you don’t take these two ingredients, you can exclude them.
Florian: While we were camping, one person had to stay awake to watch for polar bears. You never have a safe point when both of you can sleep for a period of time. You can never relax and between having to melt snow for water and cooking food, photographing during good light and polar bear watching you start not getting any good sleep. You get so exhausted that you don’t care if a polar bear comes or not. From the film side, filming under the ice is difficult, because the water is 29 degrees and you have to bring the big camera housing through a small hole in the ice. You only get 3 minutes to film which also makes it difficult.
I’d love to try my hand at writing a screenplay. After writing my very first novel (a currently unpublished MG sci-fi) I researched how to turn it into a screenplay. I soon discovered what a true art form screenplay writing was, and I let it go. But now that I’m doing this writing gig full time, I think I’d like to dive back in and see if I could take a class or workshop, and give screenplay writing a hearty try.
The smaller parties shared the lesser spoils and had a minimal impact, although it's only fair to point out that the Lib Dems
The more I force my mind to open, the stranger it seems to write about characters that resemble me in any way. Straight white physically perfect people are such a tiny minority in the real world that when you're attempting to create any kind of a realistic fantasy world it's quite *un*realistic to keep putting characters with those traits in the majority of the major roles. Unless you're deliberately writing historical Eurocentric fantasy (because you want to re-tell a European fairytale in a European setting, for example) or you're deliberately writing characters that are familiar to you because you want to use your own life experience in your story, why would you LIMIT yourself that way?
Big cities aren’t a good idea either. People themselves are generally the problem during disasters, and even on daily life its just unpleasant to be in crowded locations. Homo homini lupus. Man is man´s wolf. While civil unrest isn’t 1/1000 as dangerous to people that stay put as the media or fear mongers want you to believe, its not fun either. Big cities can also be favorite terrorist targets and if there’s social degradation they will be centers of common daily violence, drug and crime. When crime gets out of control bigger cities may still be safer than the outskirts where police hasn’t got a solid presence, but this is more of an extreme case of general social degradation.
1319 **D-V/8/1999. “The Obligations of Victims: On the Melian Dialogue.” Seminar, Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(16), above, pp. 420-23.)
Ollie Perez and Luis Castillo are still here taking up space on the roster and stealing Wilpon money. That is at the moment, unavoidable and unfortunate. We'll deal with that.
The creator and leader of the project is Saudi Arabian Prince Al-Waleed bin Talal, the wealthiest Arab in the Middle East, and nephew of King Abdullah. Talal is the chairman of Kingdom Holding Company (KHC), the largest company in Saudi Arabia, which owns the project, and a partner in Jeddah Economic Company (JEC), which was formed in 2009 for the development of Kingdom Tower and City. Reception of the proposal has been highly polarized, receiving high praise from some as a culturally significant icon that will symbolize the nation’s wealth and power, while others question its socioeconomic motives, and forecast that it will actually have negative financial consequences.
You'll never believe it. This one had gone under too! CLOSED FOREVER! Whaaat?! Are Texans not supporting their local Arby's? I was almost in tears... and now I was sure we were going to be late!! We found a Wendy's on the way to the freeway and quickly pulled through. It ended up being delicious, but there was a little hole in my heart for the Roast Beef sandwich I had been craving.
"Love, hope, peace, joy" was stamped with white pigment ink.
Skin Trade is the 17th book in Laurell Hamilton’s Anita Blake Series. As usual the book was surrounding Anita Blake as she fights her enemies and her lust as her hunger grows.
This was fun. Pure and simple. Not a whole lot of "cussing" and no neckedness, just fun. The best I would describe it if I was down at the feed store would be that it is a cross between "Die Hard" ( It does have Bruce Willis in it ) and the "Pink Panther". Neither of these movies were a big draw to me but the combination made me laugh a little.
Even if I did want to rebel against this law it’s not like there are computer programs you can use to get around the forced-blocking of the site by Britain’s main ISPs.
During the second week of school, Chloe fell off the monkey bars at recess and suffered a severe brake to her radius and ulna just above the wrist. The bones were completely disconnected making her arm look like a "W". I had no idea how traumatic a break could be as I had never experienced one myself or with a family member. We really had a tough day and it took more than 6 hours to get her patched up and back home, where the rest of the evening wasn't much better.
I had a first draft, not a finished piece. Reject letters came in and I kept writing.
Make the day seem to us less brief.
and killing gets to warring. And that was damn near the death of us all. Look at us now, busted up and everyone talking about hard rain. But we've learned by the dust of them all. Bartertown's learned. Now when men get to fighting, it happens here. And it finishes here.
Sweet Lord. This is easily the highest song ever recorded. What do I mean by "highest"? I mean this song was undoubtedly written while high, recorded while high, and produced while high. I wasn't there, but I can say with absolute conviction that no one was not stoned during any point from inception to release of this song. In fact, I think they should have given a marijuana plant writing credits for Kite Man. This song is what THC sounds like.
March 30, 1955; March 21, 1956
A few months ago I wrote a post about picking the right rock for a particular painting project in mind, called The Art of Rock Picking. I wanted to paint a tiger, and I knew vaguely what pose I wanted the tiger to be in and how big I wanted the rock to be. Oftentimes this is how I search for rocks. I’ll get a request, or an order, or I’ll just feel like painting a particular animal. I will go to my rock stash and search for a rock of a particular shape or size.
*Our digs in Rosslyn
Manny Athanasakis grew up in the olive and grape fields of Greece, learning the value of hard work at an early age. Seeking a better life, his family emigrated to the United States in 1970. It was here that Manny learned the restaurant business “hands on.”
Here’s why…
Then we have Chester Novell Turner.
b) This lasts ALL of the first two days of your detox.
sent in smoke
I am officially DONE with doing KID-CENTRIC activities. I don't want to do anything else for kids this summer! You parents whose kids are already back in school? Do me a favour: DON'T DRINK ALL THE WHISKY YET! WAIT FOR ME! WAAAAAAAAAIT FOR MEEEEEEE!
Plain and simple, right?
Three hours later my rushes were still coming, but not progressing and I finally began to feel sleepy again. By 4:30am I started to drift off to sleep, being awaken every 20minutes by rushes. By 6am, after six hours, they'd stopped altogether. That morning I made some breakfast, saw my 5yr old off to school, watched television with my mother and felt a mix of emotions. I was slightly disappointed that I wasn't in labor yet, but still amazingly calm and patient. For the last part of my pregnancy I was blessed with a calm knowing that things will unfold as they were meant too. My baby would come when it was time and the fact that I wasn't in labor yet just meant it wasn't time. I wasn't going to rush anything!
Have you ever moved a favorite book so that it has more visibility?
"The good Lord gave you a body that can stand most anything. It's your mind you have to convince"-Vince Lombardi
I am concerned that St Johns church owns half of our city square, and should they wish to do so in the future, could put new buildings there, which would mean that our city square could disappear as the central focus of the city. It is therefore essential not to erect substantial buildings on the City owned triangle of it, to ensure there will always be a Kings Square.
In the same category comes the scene at Sinspire, with the stiletto wasps. (To lighten things up, is the Pokémon Beedrill familiar? That’s how I imagine stiletto wasps. Every time.) Locke’s sympathy breaks my heart, and the poor boy in the cage… Even though I just said I like Requin, there are limits. The wasps are not acceptable.
of her bright voice
‘Yes, yes…’
is where the wardrobe used to be.
I missed this when it was released, but that's ok. I still enjoyed it. An interesting approach: a novel written by ten authors...some of whom I read just because their name is on it (Colfer, Hornby.) It switched points of view, but it didn't bother me at all. It also jumps in time a bit, which was also not bothersome.
3. Your spouse is not against you.
1. Leave me a comment saying "Interview me."
And then there’s the question of money and where it should come from.
There are times I don’t even know what I’ve accomplished until a nice librarian tells me, which is a really lovely thing. Certainly writers and illustrators add all sorts of unintentional dimensions to our work and if someone wants to give me credit for their brilliant observation, well I’m all for that!
My comment to these people is wise-up! Think long-term prospect!!! We all know that all advanced economies are moving toward knowledge based economy and all high value-added tasks would require not only an undergraduate degree but post-graduate. Yes, you may make less than a Form 5 graduate working as a shop manager or what not, how about in the future? How much upside do they have? How about yourself?
i've made a swatch for demonstration, and a very short, under three minute, video to share
Claw ring, Black Oak
Officials say a 14-year-old boy was killed while up to 50 homes were destroyed. Local media reported at least 30 injuries.
Now in its 4th year, the 2011 survey reached 3,385 expats from over 100 countries and is the world’s largest ever global survey of expats! Many of you participated in the survey, so a big thank-you for helping Expat Explorer! In case you are new to the Expat Explorer, it covers every aspect of living life abroad, including questions relating to expats’ finances, the impact of economic, political and social factors on their current country and even how recent natural disasters have affected their experience of living life as an expat.
Here's a list of general things that are all around us and yet go
through into
I'm also practicing being more of a conscientious blogger/journal-er person. I have found a few of my old book journals from back before I met my husband... Some really fascinating stuff. Stuff that Id forgotten all about. Some I didn't really remember even after reading it! It was really fun reading (Not that I'm a writer mind you, it is the thoughts, ideas and threads of exploration that I tend to meander down that capture my imagination... and I realize I was not as "out of it" as I thought.) And let's face it, who doesn't like reading about themselves? But really, I just want to document some things along the way and most of it has to do with Harley.
The fucking next door neighbours
Energy associate with a particular phase.
Roy: That's what I say. What I say is no. We don't do partners.
(Ripe strawberries , ripe!)
"Sweet Jane" Velvet Underground
The tense scene in the Cabinet Room was described by the pool reporter as “a school principal’s office with a handful of sullen suspects sitting grimly downcast as the boss says: ‘OK, we’re going to sit here all day until I find out who shot that spitball.’”
As a verb, ‘Look’ means:
Drenched with fragrant unguent
Anyone else think they were trying to butter me up for something????
Ely
List Price: $10.99
I altered the letter a bit and shared the same tradition with some of my friends at work. Again, the response was humbling. You see, when one takes a risk to share the compassion of their faith, they risk rejection. In many cases, it is with good reason as someone, in the name of faith, has done more damage to the cause with their zeal and arrogance. But that wasn't my experience at work. I found the act of caring and extending love was only greeted with gratitude and a desire to pass along to others what was bestowed upon them.
One last point. You mention a quote:
I've been reprimanded for not updating my blog so here you go! :)
Good
7. Your body sheds 10 billion flakes of skin every day.
The reliability issue was not the lone motivating factor. Obviously older thirstier cars use more petrol/gas, and accordingly attract higher taxes. £245 road tax per year. Soft top cars are also higher risk and older cars costlier to repair so insurance is more. Factoring in all this, I found that with the savings in Petrol/Gas (new car does over double the mileage), insurance (half) and the yearly tax at a measly £30 per year (thanks to extremely low CO2 emissions) we could afford to buy a new car. Okay, not quite new if truth be told, more like ever so slightly pre-loved. So our motoring costs remain the same, including loan repayment, but now we have a shiny, newer little Fiat Panda MPV that sips diesel like a, well...frugal diesel sipping thing. Making this new car greener than the old one, even though it's blue.
Without really planning to, I’ve played around quite a lot with this recipe. I’ve only made it twice, but each time was in a different kitchen, with different ingredients and tools. Both times, the cookies came out beautifully. Here are some thoughts:
I am God, and not man; the Holy One in the midst of thee: Hosea 11:9
uh - so the grapes apparently have a lot more sugar in them than the cookies that we usually bring. Kids were BOUNCING off the walls. Never ever bringing grapes again.
Preheat oven to 400F. Place beetroot and butternut squash with the sage and thyme on a large roasting tray. Toss with 1 tbls olive oil and season with salt and pepper. Roast for about 40 - 50 minutes (depending on the size of the pieces), turning half way through. Roast until the beetroot is tender and the squash is soft and golden.
Granted the only see me when I'm relaxing. ;)
What I will say though, is despite being over in terms of calories and not being happy about that… I have recorded (pretty much) everything on myfitnesspal. I have recorded probably 98% of what I’ve eaten now for 91 days now. I’ts becoming more and more difficult to remain honest when I know I’m eating a piece of toast and if I register it on myfitnesspal it will only rack up more and more. Am I proud or happy when I click complete my diary for the day and its 1800-2000 calories? Hell no. But at least I’m trying to keep myself somewhat in check.
“On behalf of Siddharth Jain, I would like to thank-you for the submission of your application for undertaking a Btech project with the above mentioned student.
Disclosure: I was given a free book to review. I have a longstanding online friendship with Tristi. However, I had no obligation to give a positive review. In fact, the last one I did for her (of someone else's book) wasn't that positive at all. I call 'em as I see them. And I see this one as a keeper.
Along with the nose assembly, the sidepods are next biggest departure for the team. By keeping the radiators and sidepod volume high and narrow, the resulting undercut in the sidepods flank creates the double floor effect and allows more airflow to pass directly over the top of the diffuser. Unlike Toro Rosso’s rounded interpretation of the undercut sidepod, FIF1’s has much flatter sides, particularly in the coke bottle region near the exhausts; the sidepod shape is particularly slim.
Read this poem of James Montgomery as he ask the question:
Note: I cheated here and added about a 1/4 cup of sour cream
The difference between
Other great Sales and discounts this weekend include:
- Desperate Housewives last episode will be called Finishing The Hat and will feature James Denton, Dana Delany, Christine Estabrook and Brenda Strong.
Jonsi: I don't know about that! Somebody said we were on an indefinite hiatus - I think it may have been our manager - and I didn't even know what it meant. We'd been touring for so many years and we'd gotten tired so we took a break and the guys had babies. I did the Riceboy Sleeps album with my boyfriend Alex Somers and also a solo record (Go) which I toured a little bit. Now we're back together and it's a really nice vibe. Personally, it's great to be working with the guys in the band again after so long. It actually feels like coming home again. I enjoyed making the solo album but at the same time it feels great working with other people, sharing responsibilities and ideas rather than having to do everything myself.
I met up with Caitlin and Mike! Caitlin and I worked together this past summer, and her and Mike were visiting Ontario for about a week! Unfortunately they were only in Toronto for one day, but at least that’s better than none!
The Olives no sooner slid down her gullet than he said
There are 900 minutes left in this day, a feast of riches. Even when I am overcome by a flood of tears, even when I ache for the one I love so far away, even when I burn the toast, or my beloved pug Coco died, still, through my tears, I realized how rich my life is, how lucky I was to have her, and how many companions I still have here. I cried until my stomach cramped and my eyes were red and raw but the moments passed, and my body relaxed, and I watched the three remaining dogs circle close around me, not taking their eyes off of me, and I thanked God for all I still had, and for all of the thousands upon thousands of moments still before me to experience all that life will bring, and I felt at peace, and there was a flicker of joy, and I felt Coco's presence, and I relaxed into my chair.
With Cody, we started out with some retrieving drills and then pile work. But by his third retrieve I could tell he was not feeling it that much. Pile work went ok, but we really need to focus on conditioning as well.
That's right. Shut up. God wants you to. Jesus said so (Jesus is God's zombie spawn who came from the best excuse for adultery ever, in case you're confused. He's also God.)
LEITMEYER K, BUCHHOLZ U, KRAMER M, SCHENKEL K, STAHLHUT H, KOLLSTADT M, HAAS W, MEYER C. Influenza vaccination in German health care workers: Effects and findings after two rounds of a nationwide awareness campaign. Vaccine 2006; 24: 7003-7008.
1 usual
Briefly: the Exportation is a mildly sour version of a mild Baltic Porter, and was quite tasty and easily enjoyed, not a smack in the chops or a pucker in the cheeks. Ovila Dubbel is a nice example of the style, rich but not sticky; the Saison is spicy and brisk, very enjoyable. And the Ruthless Rye was great, a battling mouthful of beer, shot full of spicy rye character that blended marvelously with the bold hops. A very nice beer indeed.
Since announcing his resignation earlier this month, at a time of continuing rancour inside the Church over both those topics, the Archbishop has made a series of outspoken interventions.
IBUs: 41
Does a skin flute count? One time at band camp... yes, I was a band geek for my entire high school career and yes, I did play the flute. I also took up the french horn, the saxamaphone (for a summer) and guitar. I can still pick out a few things on the guitar but I haven't picked up any of the other instruments in years so I'm not sure if I can make the grade.
Brooks: some of his beach houses
Our new puppy is 7 months old so he's almost self-reliant, not to mention cute as a button. A miniature Foxy crossed with ... something, he's small with black and white markings and kinda ruffled so we've named him Scruffy. Unoriginal but really fits. His first night, he settled quietly in his new dog bed on the old couch in the back undercover area. Lovely.
Don’t fret–I have a perfect DC meets LA way to explain!
Mix well, cover and leave aside for at least 30 minutes.
1 tonight
Savard: Yes. After all, the man earns it.
Thanks to you all for your comments on the demise of The Little White House! I do believe I will take a shovel and bucket over and collect some of that precious soil :)
What was next was my pet peeve. A horrible media buy for Titantic 3D. In case you were curious if Emily’s soul has been possessed by Chris Harrison, she was made to watch Titanic which is about losing your lover and didn’t she lose her rich race car lover in a plane crash. That is some fucked up media buying ABC/Paramount! Also, having girls put on makeup just to put on ugly 3D glasses made no sense, even for this show. It made me hate Titanic because nothing screams 100 million dollar budget movie like having 3 brain-dead girls compare their lives on reality television to it.
'South Wales needs a Plan!' declared a book published during the Great Depression, on one of the 'distressed areas' hit hardest during the 1930s. The cities of South Wales – Cardiff, Newport, Swansea – became boomtowns in the late nineteenth century for one reason, and one reason only – to export and process the produce of the coal seam that ran across the valleys, and the tiny industrial towns that arose to service them. Now, in 2011, it seems the place needs a Plan, again; among the places worst hit by the recession are the likes of Merthyr Tydfil, which face huge rates of unemployment. The same places hit, in the same ways, yet again. Iain Duncan Smith helpfully suggested that the people of Merthyr up sticks to Cardiff, where there are nine unemployed people for every job vacancy. The Valleys are at least topical.
Ellsworth and Devereux were both enamored by the Zouave regiments of North Africa. Known for their exhaustively precise drilling techniques and their distinctive uniforms, the two young men created and shared command of the Chicago Cadets Zouave company.
Anyhoo, Adrianne's lifestyle blog accompanies her painting business which produces "Fun Art for Cool Kids." Naturally, much of her blog content addresses fun activities, party ideas and decor for kiddies. Right before Anna arrived, Lambchop's posts were dedicated to nursery decorating, with Adrianne providing tons of ideas for painting and decorating the sweet one's new space.
Tony Lucca (Team Adam) – Last time we saw Tony perform, Xtina called Tony one dimensional and that caused a dialogue between Adam and Tony and they both felt he has been singing the same type of songs during the competition so they wanted to show a different side of him surprising everyone. Tonight he sang a Britney Spears “Hit Me Baby One More Time.” It certainly got my attention. I think it was cool, but I could tell he was nervous while singing it. He definitely added something stand out and interesting to The Voice history. Afterwards, Carson addressed Xtina first (I am sure to see if she might say something negative) but suggested bringing Britney and Justin out to have a real Mickey Mouse Club reunion. She also said she enjoyed it. Blake said it pissed him off because it was really smart. Adam said he loved Tony. He said that it started off as Tony’s idea, but then he backed off of the idea not wanting to do it, so they fought about it and then figured he should stare his Mickey Mouse Club past in the face and do it. He said Tony embraced it and Adam was very proud of him. 1-855-VOICE-05
So strong you thump O terrible drums—so loud you bugles blow.
I realize there are limits to looking back to 1980s and 1990s interior decorators - those men, generally speaking, whom I call the Lost Generation - and a time must come when that particular seam is mined out and a new direction must be found. That said, yesterday I found another Arthur E Smith interior (his own, a carriage-house and second home, in Charleston, SC) in a batch of old magazine clippings - an article saved because of the house and its interiors, not because of the decorator, for those days, I think, I had little idea of Smith's role in my recurring theme of connections within connections.
Step 4: In your ‘Recipe’ Book write down your recipe with your permanent Marker. Also write it on your bottle
*) Let students in public (i.e., taxpayer-funded) schools use empty classrooms for prayers in New Jersey.
Thank you to all of you that entered my birthday giveaway. I apologize that it has taken me so long to announce a winner. Moving across the country really takes it out of you, much more than I ever could have imagined! I really enjoyed reading all of your favorite birthday memories!
If I disappeared… would you realize you loved me more?
Okay and as an aside? I bought this book on a whim, Amazon had the Kindle version on sale for like 99 cents and it appeared to get decent reviews. Um, OMG THIS BOOK WAS AWFUL. I planned to read it during some downtime while in Madison and I swear, I was sitting on the exercise bike in the teeny hotel exercise room and wanted to throw the ‘book’ across the room. It’s like the Twilight books, but written even more poorly, except instead of a teenager mooning over a sparkly vampire it’s a 35-year-old chubby virgin professor mooning over a male escort. In-between giving him lessons in writing his memoirs (he, in return, taught her ‘how to please a maaaaaaaahn). It was so.freaking.awful, do not be tricked into buying it like I was. I can’t finish it and I’m the type who gets twitchy if I don’t finish a book, no matter how bad. Well: life is too short to waste on this book.
The boys playing in the basement
“I can’t lose you.” He had barely managed to get this out through his clenched teeth.
But I do truly love it. As I mentioned earlier, I have been writing as long as I could clutch a crayon in my stubby little fist. I started reading and writing very young, and it seems like from early childhood on, I devoured books and I wanted to express myself that way, in words. I feel blessed that Lerner and Graphic Universe have provided me with an opportunity to do that and to work with talented artists, too.
Q032) What is MINZY-san’s fighting clothes?
I have been THAT mom, the one who has pizza for breakfast, just cuz.
The Rooster Prince of Breslov by Ann Stampler with illustrations by Eugene Yelchin
I was very happy with the result, that I share with you today, World Day of Pinhole Photography.
Consoles
The Raiders responded in kind. At 5 AM, on the morning of August 21, 1863, Quantrill's Raiders, accompanied by about 450 supporters, marched into Lawrence, Kansas, ripping men and boys out of their homes. They murdered 183 males, burning down everything in their way. The Union Jayhawker's, the opposite team of guerrillas, retaliated, and they began hitting back and forth harder and harder, until Quantrill was forced to flee to Texas with his entire force, which promptly split up into smaller groups of raiders. On the way there, though, he and his men killed eighty men at a Union headquarters. This would be referred to as the Barter Springs Massacre.
So an hour later I’m back home. And I’m writing this. And I’m wondering if whether whilst I was wasting my time on you when you clearly can’t show me you want me to be yours some other beautiful man could have been standing next to me.
In promotional or ceremonial contexts (such as a list of donors or corporate officers), titles are capitalized even when following a name. Example:
I wish I had answers for the addict and those addicted to him or her. It truly is very complex, and the surface reasons can vary a great deal, however, I believe the pattern is almost universal. This is based on my own experiences with a number of family members and friends.
“So we’re going to rescue the Hagglesmiths then?” asked Jeremy hopefully.
Circa: 14th century AD (in green and dark green):
Afloat like embered paper-scraps burning
Bit rate mode : Constant
Olive Tree Bible Reader is one App that everyone has to have, it is a popular App and yet there are many who have no idea what it is about or that it even exists. Okay, unless you have been living under a tree or in a cave for the past few years, you would have heard of the IPhone, iPads, Blackberry and other smart phones, and of course this makes it so much easier for us to have information at the tips of our fingers.
“How do I even communicate with you? Is this right?” he continues, his words shaking, “I don’t know. I’m afraid you might be mad if I said something wrong, if I said something that would insult you… something that’s not such a respectful approach. But, God, I’m tired… It’s time I became truly honest. Oh no…would you even still love me?”
* Popcorn together with peanut butter morsel's is such a great combo
Ann: She got very good at swearing! Talking was harder. She would think she was talking properly but all that came out of Claire for the first six weeks or so was ‘oh’. And if you didn’t understand what that ‘oh’ meant, Claire got frustrated, then she would swear at you. Eventually she would get the right word.
First, the product design is killer and amazingly well thought out. The speakers are tiny, I mean tiny. Maybe 1 and 1/2 inches tall and wide, dome-shaped marvels. They stack together with a magnetic connection and squeeze into a little pouch that takes up no more than 4 x 2 inches of bag space. Item weight is said to be one pound, but it feels lighter to me. That's it! Yeah, I've seen smaller single speaker units, but not double speakers. Not for real stereo sound separation. Not a bad start, but the engineering gets better from there.
Title: lyrics from “Falling in Love Again,” performed by Marlene Dietrich.
it was WONDERFUL again this year.
The current store theme evokes the feeling of a French flea market. Designers decorate stores with simple, everyday items and make them beautiful if not enchanting. Why not broaden that to wholly embrace the French flea market style economy?
This blog is mainly for transitioning into HR, but today I’d like to write more about cultural transition. I’m a huge advocate for working abroad and I truly believe that without global knowledge you are limiting your professional and personal opportunities.
I have started picking up little things when I am out and thought what a perfect day, PINK Saturday, to share the news.
John DeWolfe...Michael Robertson
– Millions in Forfeited Bail Uncollected in Texas’ Tarrant County
Following her usual route on Sunday, the day had started out with a chill in the air but half way through her walk turned quite warm. The mace was tucked in the front pocket of her hoodie and the hoodie was getting too warm as she worked up a sweat. Stopping by a slow-moving stream, she set down her water bottle and pulled the hoodie over her head forgetting that the mace was still in her pocket. As she tugged to pull off the tight-fitting neck she somehow managed to depress the spray nozzle on the mace and saturated her face. Blinded and eyes stinging she searched for the only available water, that being the rather slimy stream and threw her face in it. People were apparently passing by as she doused herself face first and giving her a wide berth.
And lastly, all good things come in Aveda packages. This is one of my favorite brands, ever. Hands down. When I think spa, I definitely think Aveda. Every now and then I'll get the itch to have a few spa items for my own everyday use... and the products disappear so fast. It's almost depressing. Kind of like how quickly Christmas comes and goes, a bottle of Shampure shampoo/conditioner won't last long enough. It's just that good. On my Aveda Pamper Me List is the following:
Roadrunner – The Modern Lovers
1 nerves
After three and a half years I know for certain that we can do a long distance relationship. It’s the “in-person”/24-7 part that worries me most at this point.
The inevitable make-up kiss. And Gibby’s song, just awesome.
time and again words
So down 2-0 in the series you would think that New York’s players would be smart and work hard to fight back right? Well Amare Stoudemire, one of the Knicks best players, decided it was a good idea to punch the glass case of a fire extinguisher. He badly hurt his hand and now could miss the rest of the playoffs.This here was a completely selfish move because any chance the Knicks had to come back against the Heat is over now.
What’s the best choice for a camcorder for a You Tube video, a blog video, or a product video? What’s the best choice for taking a video of you family vacation or your class reunion? What are the pros and cons of a traditional camcorder versus one of the portable, compact ones? This article discusses the popular Flip portable television camera and video recorder.
Cranberry Casserole
We all know how unpredictable and sometimes totally stupid the American voters can be. The bottom ones are Roshan and Sherri. Surprise and shock. It's Sherri. Bless her heart. Didn't see that coming. She's been wanting to be on DWTS for many years and was so happy to be part of it. She'll have a hard time watching it and talking about it on The View. As much as she gets on my nerves sometimes, this makes me so sad for her.
Besides, tomorrow’s another day. While Island life was a way of life, I’ve recently planted two seeds in my own work-garden and they’ll need tending.
Anthony McGowan's The Knife that Killed me was on the Guardian shortlist and I don't need to tell you just how many prizes Patrick Ness's The Knife of Never Letting Go has won.
1/3 c. granulted sugar
“I often like to be adventurous and push the envelope with my style. But trying to fit the perfect outfit with the perfect event /location is not easy”
If you wish to read one of the new tales click here -
and not periodically examine these characters and how they relate to the readership.
Before I moved to the Pacific Northwest, and when I was making good money at UC Berkeley, I often treated my mother and myself to a day at the spa. Casa Madrona in Sausalito, O-Spa in Alameda. Once, we both got pedicures – a first for both of us, and we just so happened to choose the same color nail polish for our toes. When we were outside we both stopped to admire each other’s freshly polished tootsies, and then we laughed. “To think, some people do this all the time.” My mother mused. “Man it tickles!” I said, shivering. Then we walked together arm-in-arm, in matching flip-flops, with matching feet, wearing almost-matching black outfits.
Congratulations! Not only have you arrived pissing and screaming on Planet Earth, wriggling around like peeled slugs in a bag of salt - you've just ramped up the global population to the 7 BILLION mark! Woo-hoo for you! I remember when I was forcibly farted out of the womb, all those years ago, so I do understand what you're going through. Seeing as my mum drank Guinness throughout her pregnancy, I nearly ripped the poor woman apart on my exit, scowling at the midwife, howling for a kebab and literally vomiting with relief at having escaped the dark ambient soundtrack wafting around her uterus.
Book Synopsis: Math whiz Savannah Stone makes a living creating Math puzzles in rural North Carolina. But when the mayor starts receiving death threats, Savannah needs to solve this puzzle-before the next box to be filled is the mayor’s coffin. (Courtesy of GoodReads.com)
I have firefox open only to have my other gmail account open.
It’s truly bizarre to contemplate that after almost 2,300 posts spread over seven years at this blog, I sometimes feel like absolutely nothing of merit has been passed along from me to you – and the failure is my problem, not yours.
Part 4 - The Importance of Social Media and Social Media as Advertising
Olsen J, Rachootin P. Organic solvents as possible risk factors of low birthweight (Letter). J Occup Med 1983; 25: 845-855.
Tut. Tut.
Sherrie Wilkolaski, Lulu publishing Consultant
And here's 6 coats which is where I stopped. It held up (this is on the video too) these magnets no problem and these too even though they are not near as strong as the first. It can also hold up a piece of construction paper but if you want to hang lots of papers from it or if that's your main purpose, you may want to paint more than 6 coats.
Instead, she tells her tale. She takes time to think it up, she takes time to make sure it’s consistent and she tells it using the traditional rules of language and grammar.
The Towner Gallery in Eastbourne has appealed for help in buying two interesting pieces by John Piper, both showing the harbour at Newhaven. Both pictures are currently on show at the gallery, as part of its summer blockbuster, 'John Piper in Kent and Sussex', and they're among the best on display.
Joanna Trollope, chair of this year's Orange Prize, has said that she found reading all the books on her Kindle or iPad a most unsatisfactory experience:
When I decided that I wanted to make this card using the bee from Create A Critter, I thought....4 bee's at 1.5 inches....that's a lot of little pieces. So I tried something in CCR and it worked! I added all the pieces for the bee to my mat and filled them with colors from Lori's Garden. I made a copy of the wings and the head/belly piece and had to hide one wing on one cut and the opposite on the other copy so I could layer them. Otherwise you have the set of wings, but they don't match up. I then layered all the pieces in the order that they go and clicked the Don't Weld button for each piece. This way I ended up with a fully colored bee without having to cut all the layer's separately. I also hid the face so I could stamp those cute PK faces on them. Here is what it looked like after I printed them only, no cutting.
“Well, I’m seventeen and a quarter, Dad,
Sassafras chipboard stickers, Fur & Fabric Pal Around #25007
It's been a while since I've played... let's see if I remember how to write :-)
Hooked, so that I refused to put it away when I was walking home from the bus stop, on a wet and dark evening (the irony of sharing a similar atmospheric setting with the narrator leant itself to a little more enjoyment on my behalf). And when the following day I put it down after having finished it, I refused to pick up another book for days. It stayed with me in the way brilliant books do. I’m a sucker for a crisis, doomed love, moral agonising, especially when it’s written without being sentimental. Tragedy is key for me, and this had all the great elements of it; the torture of wanting one thing but being completely unable to reconcile with that want because of one’s duty made me want to tell everyone I met to read it. Of course, the subject matter might not be to everyone’s tastes, the tragedy might even be slightly too dramatic for one’s liking, but the narrative! Oh the narrative! I stop to put both hands on my chest, close my eyes, and say, ‘Oh my God, you HAVE to read The End of the Affair.
PKR national women vice-president Voon Shiak Ni said that not much had been done to ensure a fairer and transparent electoral process since the Bersih 2.0 rally last year.
PRC 2 aired the first episode of the season last night and viewers were thrown instantly into the nerve-wracking process of what it takes to make it as a fashion designer in Canada. The designers on the show are all up and coming with a few on the scene designers who have already began to create a name for themselves. For the other designers who are new to the scene, the show displayed the intensity of what lies at stake for any designer hoping to make it.
It's easy to put back together at this point. You only have five screws to keep track of. Of course, the reason for doing all this was to clean each part. You may need some WD-40 or oil to lubricate the shutter mechanism. They get old and gunky and tend to stick. Just coat liberally with your preferred lubricant and wipe the excess off. Put her back together and go take some pictures!
A Congolese?
But we digress (somewhat).
He called me EVERY. SINGLE. DAY. I had things to do, Biology to study for, and this guy was driving me crazy. He wanted to call me all the time, but we had nothing to talk about. I remember covering the phone with my hand and asking my mom if she could yell at me, tell me to take out the garbage or wash the dishes, and make me get off the phone with Jordan.
19. Emerald Bikini (Deep Down 4) (01:28)
She answered the phone and I could tell right away something was wrong. Her breathing was shallow and heavy. She was moving around a lot. It was like she was in pain.
Jeffery was totally overshadowed by his older "parent" in Michael, who came complete with Eurotrash accent and a vile temper. And what came forth from Michael's mouth was beyond bitchy. If this man moved in next door to us, I would move. Michael is the type of old queen that makes Boys in the Band look like a comedy.
It is true to say that certain beers are so well crafted that they write the reviews themselves. With these beers, every element has been engineered with such precision that the experience of drinking them is a clearly defined one, and leaves no room or need for interpretation or embellishment.
9.Hungry For Love (Mills)
To prepare, I only ran the week before. No Body Pump and no Zumba. Just running. I upped my miles on the treadmill to 4 miles and I was getting it done in about 56 minutes. By Saturday I was feeling pretty good.
-ramps (also called "wild leek" and found stream side)
This aqua scarf is actually my favourite thing I found. The colour is delicious in real life and I love the metallic sparkle in it. It isn't that long, but I've been thinking of sewing it end to end to make a spring infinity scarf. As is the case with most items I buy, wash it first to get rid of any heebeejeebees. Oh, and the scarf was only $1.50. Yesiree.
This week at Walgreens there is a sale on Kotex U products. Pads, Liners, and Tampons are included. I love these products because they are so compact and fit in my purse easily.
Hearing loss is – as we might expect – invisible. Jacques Derrida’s Memoirs of the Blind, however, is an account, based on many works in the Louvre, of sighted artists’ images of blindness. But how can we convey the sound of deafness? The ecstatic and angular final works of Beethoven (such as the late string quartets, the Diabelli Variations and Piano Sonata no. 32 in C minor, op. 111) are astonishing achievements in abstraction and testaments to the visuality of musical composition, but how would a hearing composer denote a deaf world? Perhaps they can’t and don’t need to, for if the human sensorium is a gestalt, and a change in one part of it changes the whole, we might expect that when one door of perception closes another opens: blind poets and musicians from Homer to Stevie Wonder have been celebrated and admired. Perhaps their courage and intensity of truth-saying is something we – sighted or not, deaf or not – might learn from as we all try to make the best of our limitations and losses.
life so attached to her own.
It’s not exactly mind blowing is it? Sometimes fans need to trust the board and I think sometimes the board need to be a little stronger in the backing of “the bright new hope”. For what it’s worth, I believe Blackburn will stay up, hopefully with Kean in charge. The scorpions “Wind of Change” is now going round my head and this time it has nothing to do with Brussel Sprouts!
Stranger Than Paradise (Jim Jarmusch)
5) “On the Coen’s film that I am shooting right now we are averaging about 11 set ups a day whilst the screen time can vary from 6 minutes to 2 minutes depending on the scene. My set up time averages around 20 minutes. Normally the first set up will take the longest and my time will generally coincide with hair and make up time. For that reason it is usual to do the most complex or widest set up first. We rarely work more than 12 hours on this film and some days are shorter. The film has been very well prepared and I have a clear idea of the way we will shoot each sequence.” (Note: Comment was made in 2008 so that could have been A Serious Man)
The fourth quarter earnings season was a strong one, and this week should start to provide clues if that will be true for the first quarter as well. While few in number, some of the firms that are reporting are very significant ones, and they represent an interesting cross section of the economy. In addition to Alcoa, the firms reporting next week include: Bank of America (BAC), Google (GOOG), J.P. Morgan (JPM), Mattel (MAT) and Hasbro (HAS).
Now, I already have a billion favourite banana bread recipes, but of course I had the urge to try something new, something different. Let me tell you there are lots of variations on banana bread out there that look amazing. Peanut butter banana bread? That has my name written all over it. Lime coconut banana bread? Delicious! I will definitely be making those sometime soon since my banana pile doesn’t seem to be getting any smaller!
The USPTO's classification system has been different from the International Patent Classification System (IPC) because (a) the USPTO's classification system came first, and (b) WIPO decided to take a different classification path when developing the IPC. As a result, two sets of classification codes are used during examination.
We did a little walk through of my day in the parking lot. He was the bad guy. It was basic and it never got to the I am on the ground stage. He asked me for my money and ironically, I wanted to say no, but the point was not what I would do now, but what I didn't do then. We had been doing a lot of grabbing of the wrist and how to get out of that and I wanted to know how I could have gotten out of it when the bad guy grabbed my wrist.
My new little granddaughter is due to make her entrance into this world within the next two weeks - such cold weather for her , still she'll be kept snug and warm basking in everyone's love.
She provides more history, and then says:
Stevens County, Kansas (Cimarron River) - Remember Belle Starr? Well, her nephew Henry Starr came to fame as the Cherokee Bad Boy, a robber of banks, train depots and stores, along with his gang. Before he died, shot during a robbery in Arkansas on February 23, 1921, he claimed he had robbed 21 banks, for more than $60,000, some of which was hidden along the Cimarron River in SW Kansas.
Israel is no “mercenary of the West in the heart of the Middle East” but an outpost of Western civilization in the midst of barbarians. Besieged on all sides within the short span of 60 years it became culturally, politically, economically, and scientifically the most developed nation of the region and deservedly proud of this great achievement. Moreover as a civilized outpost, Israel is at the forefront of the fight against the holy warriors of Islam, of Hamas and Hezbollah, the proxies of its most dangerous enemy Iran.
Social media marketing like all marketing is an art, not a science. Each company that chooses to engage in social media is different, and each campaign will be different. Some efforts will take off immediately, while others will take longer. However, if social media is employed, the return for businesses is almost always far greater than the investment.
Want to be an actor in film, TV and movies? We can help you break in to show business! We provide a fully searchable database for casting directors to search for talented actors and actresses across the country. We understand what it is like to be an background actor seeking auditions for movies, films and TV. Use Networks Casting Service to securely submit your resume and pictures online.
(But Mama Chin only uses butter and would slap your wrist if you suggested anything else. She thinks she’s being wild and crazy using whole wheat flour. Okay, she’s a traditionalist, but the Save On has been in business for almost a hundred years with the same family owning the café, so sometimes tradition works!)
We therefore objected to participating in this 3-part process, as we had come with the understanding that it would merely be an interview with Irene. Fadiah also made it clear that denying the presence of a lawyer during the next stage of questioning would be a violation of Irene’s right to be represented as guaranteed in the Federal Constitution, as well as a violation of the rights of the lawyer to represent as spelled out in the Legal Profession Act.
According to Judge David Groner, Kilpatrick "lied under oath about his affair with his chief of staff, about the firing of a deputy chief, authorized a secret settlement with $8.4 million in taxpayer money and then violated his probation....Kilpatrick at every turn tried to thwart attempts to figure out how much money he had to pay restitution to the City of Detroit."
-Peanut Butter Blossoms
I don't and didn't know. What do I know now?
Book launch—presentation of the newest e-flux journal reader, Are You Working Too Much? With talks by Lars Bang Larsen and Brian Kuan Wood. Friday 17th, 5pm, Book Coop.
In a separate bowl, beat butter and sugar until pale, add salt and egg yolk, beat until smooth. Add it to mixer bowl along with milk and water. Knead using dough hook until smooth. Gather the dough into a round ball, place it in a lightly oiled bowl. Cover with plastic, and let it rest for an hour.
1484 D-XI/16(B)/2003. “If You’re As Good As You Look, Why Aren’t You a University of Chicago Professor? Hyde Park Historical Society, Chicago, Illinois. See Item D-IV/23/1975, above. See, for the text of this 2003 talk, http://hydeparkhistory.org. See, also, www.anastaplo.wordpress.com. See as well, The Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, June 24, 2004, pp.7-8
Lots of holiday stuff at auction on eBay too!
“What do you mean, ‘for me’ ?”
I began Christmas Eve day as I always do: listening to the Festival of Nine Lessons and Carols from King's College in Cambridge, England. Every year it opens with the pure soprano voice of a young boy singing "Once in Royal David's City," and every year I get chills the instant I hear it. Somewhere deep inside me lives the girl who loved midnight Mass and whose greatest musical performance thrill was playing the organ for the parish men's choir for two years. (Remember, beating Bob Dylan in a talent contest wasn't especially significant until several years later when he became uber-famous.)
Necklace: Aura: Ethereal Prayer Beads
A massive thankyou Andrea, Blankina and Judy for joining us for this challenge, it's been a real honour to have three such talented crafters as our GD's. If you have a moment please stop by our GD's blogs, you wont be disappointed!!!
2 rise
I am a Warrior and member of a team.
Hi Everyone, Welcome to a new week here at Come and Get It Challenges. Since it is the fifth week of the month here. We have an anything goes challenge. So we would love to see a card, scrapbook page, any 3d object or whatever you have to show us. Thanks for everyone's support and look forward to seeing your creations. Remember to link to your project not just your blog. Thanks again from the Design Team
the only thing we have to pay for is my food and a rental car.
My good friend Elaine Biss had Tea Forte sent to me in a scrumptious Orchid Vanilla scent and flavor, they are the company who puts their tea-bags in those little pyamid shapes and they are so divine. She also sent the Sweet Orange Spice Butter Tea Cookies from Tea Forte. Light and sweet I had my own private tea party :)) Thank you Elaine for your sweet gift :)
Third, I just wanted to make you wait a little longer, I didn't REALLY have anything to add. I just wanted to make you wait a few seconds longer before you found out who the real winner is.
ardor is distributed into
- Small amount of polyfil for stuffing acorns.
Every circle has its end,
Hubby and I have spent so so many New Year's Eves doing all sorts of fantastic things, really splashing out and having the full monty of both black tail, tuxedo and dark suit. Celebrating in really grand style in many places.
awakened from his hellwood now that
My favorite animal is a dog of course! I adore my little Yorkie Bentley! He always can put a smile on my face, because he definitely has a GREAT little personality. I love snuggling with him when the weather starts to get cold!
Anyway the bloody diarrhea is technically produced by a toxin called the Shiga toxin and that is the toxin that damages the intestines. This nasty little toxin infects more than 70,000 people a year in the United States. That's crazy! That's a whole lot of people every year. You'd think Colby's doctor would have picked up on the major indicator of something like that but again that's just the jaded parent talking.
But I confess that my affections for you are often grievously tepid while my selfish interests steam.
beauty + ful = beautiful
I haven't been able to get on my grass for a fortnight so it is getting long, but it looks great and green and it'll stay dry long enough for it to get cut before long I'm sure. I saw a farmer on the local TV news who was talking about the devastating effect of no rain and having driven past a few fields lately, the new crops are looking good, in fact the yellow rape-seed oil plants are in full flower in places.
In a last-ditch attempt to boost its chances in Chicago, using the ruling of the ICJ as its main argument, Macedonia’s parliament this week passed a declaration that reaffirms the country’s commitment towards the NATO membership bid.
Paper: Poppy Parade, Peach Parfait, Concord Crush, Whisper White
I have been writing about my family and growing up because I have been working on my family tree through ancestry.com. It has not been easy! Although it seems to me that I am related to at least half of South Texas (on my father’s side), I don’t have many records to go on for generations before my grandparents. I’ve heard stories about different things that supposedly happened in the past, but like any story worth telling there is probably some embellishing. We’ve also, supposedly, have had a change of our surname It’s even harder to get any information about our Native American heritage.
Lost in thought and counting stitches, Norma didn’t see the form on the bed move. Instead, she heard the squeak from the pillows and looked up to find her daughter frowning at her. Swallowing the surprise, Norma smiled slowly, “Good morning.”
Even Esta abandons me and hobbles over to have a taste.
Always remember to share your blankie!!
Check out my hat.
“That’s nice to know. It’s nice to know a person likes your soul when she sees it…”
If you must call him, call once. If he doesn’t call you back, you weren’t enough of a priority. He’s not concerned with your feelings about him.* It’s obvious that he’s not thinking about you. He didn’t call on his own. It was nice of you to call but he didn’t return your call and it’s been two days. He’s probably not dead. If he was excited about your call, he would make a beeline for the phone.
My internet connection is still problematic, here is the most recent email I sent the hoors...
17,951 days have passed since the Hawks have won the Stanley Cup, and there are so many people to thank; Joel Quenneville for his fabulous coaching, Niemi and his mad goalie skills, Big Buff’s big hits, Olympians Seabrook, Keith, Kane and Toews, and Marian Hossa’s showing at the Stanley Cup Finals, on three teams, in the past three years (I guess the third time’s the charm!). What could be more exciting than seeing the 22 year old, team captain, Jonathon Toews winning the Play-off MVP!?!
Even with the Obama administration constantly weasling around with the stats (ie, dropping those who are no longer eligible to file for monthly unemployment claims from the statistics, intentionally adjusting then falsifying season hiring criteria for statistical purposes, etc), unemployment is a big problem for the Socialist Party, er, excuse me. . . the Democrat Party.
Just wanted to share some photo's from our recent weekend trip to New Jersey and NYC. We had a FABULOUS time!! Another wonderful company Christmas party and a day in the big apple.
Cockney: "Oooh.. ok.. the Data Base, yeah I think we need to test the connection to the right joint."
The sheer size of the problem shows the need for more effective drugs. Pain hurts, in more ways than one.
The book describes how to become a medium, how to give an angel reading, and what to expect from your clients. Also, how to market yourself and what to expect from your friends, family, relationships as you step onto your path with the Angelic ones.
Today I went and saw THE AVENGERS.
-- of course, that's incredibly silly. It's my dream to be a professional author, and if I can get that far, there will always be new goals. Even if I'm lucky enough to sign with Secret Agent Man, I'll still have to go out on submission. Even if I'm astronomically lucky enough to get this book published, there's still the next book to worry about. And as with any goal, I'm sure there will be unexpected setbacks and changes that need to be accounted for - few things ever turn out exactly the way they do in your head.
Thanks everyone and I hope to see you soon over at
I saw a face
SEK 283 for two books (apprx USD 40)
Feast your eyes on our Design Team's awesome creations this week, and we hope you find inspiration in them! These ladies never cease to amaze me with their creativity!
In his four and a half years of life, Pip’s dominant examples of social interaction have come almost exclusively from Ava and me. While in some ways this relationship is to be expected of most children and their primary caregivers, Pip’s bubble has a few qualities that make it even more intense. For starters, since I am a full-time father, he has had very limited experience with non-familial caregivers like preschool teachers, day care providers, nannies, or even babysitters. Our home-centered childcare model also means that he does not currently have a classroom of peers that he interacts with on a regular basis. Instead, his contact with children his own age tends to be limited to whatever casual interactions happen on the playground. Lastly, as we don’t watch television with the kids, that avenue of social observation is also unavailable to him. For better or worse, when Pip wants a model for how to handle a situation, he is largely stuck with using what he has observed from us as his starting point.
All that being said, most people probably will not take the time to delve into this enough to really understand it. Many commenters are saying they are getting nowhere with their family and friends when they try to explain this.
I don’t know about you, but my favorite way to start out the day is with a run outside. For my fellow runners that aren’t aware, this website allows you to input an address and from there, you can map routes for runs, walks, bike rides and just about anything else you want to know! You can even get a map of the elevation changes, calculate calories burned and different types of distances covered. You can save your runs, make friends, find events, and even form groups to fit all your workout needs. I mainly use it to plot out runs each day and it has made it easier for me to switch up my routine so I don’t get bored running by the same house each and every day. So if you don’t use it already, definitely check it out!
Only in an accident
Here we go again!
We were given exclusive access to a secret cabinet meeting dossier. The dossier is from a financial review meeting held last month at Downing Street. The meeting was chaired by the Prime Minister David Cameron.
When you are finished, hit Finalize and Submit Order
With a bald spot in the middle of my hair--
Visitors often comment that trips have helped to relive stress and anxiety, and that they feel more confident after accessing the nature environment and some have been inspired creatively to draw pictures or write poems about their experiences.
“Because of you…
Me: Sir, I can’t help you. I’m just a woman who happens to be married to a man named Guy Woods. We don’t have any authority to tell you what to do with your trees.
I got an email for a job at a charter school. I set up an interview time. I had to reschedule. I got a bit scared because of rescheduling. I went to the interview. I liked the school. I liked the students. I nailed the interview. I left feeling absolutely positive. I went to get something to eat. I got a phone call. I was told by the principal that he wanted me for the position. I celebrated. I got an official offer. I told him I would accept after he emailed, called, and texted me about the job. I found out today that my references have been called.
In fact, they have about 4 bankers on it right now, staying up all hours trying to hatch a plan to get me a home loan.
Corporate Address: 12 Jonathan Lane, Poughkeepsie, NY 12603
McGann
“Let me watch!”
Unauthorised copying and distribution of copyrighted music is breaking the law, and that includes file-swapping of any copyrighted music on the best-known P2P networks such as Limewire. The recording industry has taken action against many people who have done this, with some large fines resulting.
Neighbour to other international brands such as Abercrombie & Fitch and Marks & Spencer, both of which recently opened Parisian flagships on the Champs Elysees, Banana Republic completes the set of big-name high street giants on the famous avenue. The grand 1500m2 store, with its Hamptons-esque refined luxury, is spread over two floors and features the whole gamut of its men's and women's collections including Weekend (casual separates) and Monogram (high end evening wear), and with shoes, costume jewellery, bags and belts thrown in to the mix. Classics such as the trench coat, white shirt, chinos and little black dress are Banana Republic staples, but seasonal trends such as taffeta ball gown skirts and beaded clutches are also on sale, and a personal shopper is available in store to help you choose the perfect combination of affordable American luxury to suit your body, lifestyle and budget.
Truth be told, there are not that many steps anyway.
The big day started with an army of children, no doubt relieved to have a break from playing mumblety-peg and dying of scarlet fever, marching from the south gate of the Capitol grounds down to the new City Hall, while singing “America.” Speeches were given by Mayor F. M. Maddox, Alderman C. W. Moore, and the Honorable T. W. Gregory. Besserer’s Band, which contrary to popular belief, was not an early Roky Erickson group, also favored the crowd with several rousing numbers.
- these give rise to more negative emotions and over time make us forget the person we are and do something truly bizarre, stuff we’ll wish we hadn’t done (and i dont mean counting how much you can drink when really, really angry!).
I chose the colors for this page based on the meanings for friendship that they symbolize. Brown for comfort (that Teddy provides) and red for love (that Andrew has for him). The white and black were added for contrast. I started with a sketch from Ashley Horton. She has started a new monthly sketch challenge called Sketch It Out, also at Club CK. Along with the sketch, she threw in a twist---we needed to use woodgrain, hexagons or a chevron pattern on our layout. I designed a hexagon template with my Silhouette and then made some white spray mist to create a subtle background. At first I wasn't sure I was happy with the effect, but now that the page is done, I really like how it looks.
I have to have patience and focus with every project I am apart of.
One of the better aspects of the beer blogs has been the absence of election based tosh. Until today. Kristy let the side down by not ignoring the election and the activities of thieves, spivs, liars and charlatans. Poor form, old girl. I was expecting a fair bit about people’s opinions in regard to what is good for pubs, beer (pongy or otherwise) and the various vacuous promises of the political classes. It’s been thankfully short coming. Yeh for beer blogging.
Everything about water is about to change – how we think about it, what we pay for it, where we get it, how we use it.
Getting back to gunpowder weapons, though, I think they're reasonable enough on a spaceship once you take these factors into account. One could go to the trouble to invent a laser gun or some kind of energy blaster, but consider:
For the first FTF for 2012, it has to be about the summer fruit that is in season now. One of my favourites at the moment, cherries. I love fresh cherries, not so much canned, or cherry flavoured things, but lovely fresh, dark, glistening, plump, juicy cherries, mmmmmmmmmmm. They are really hard to find during the rest of the year, but at the moment the local cherries are at their best. I can't get enough of them.
Beat the butter and cream cheese on medium speed until smooth. Sift in the powdered sugar, and beat on low speed until incorporated. Add the sour cream or yogurt, vanilla, lemon juice and salt, and beat well to incorporate. The best part: “If the frosting is lumpy from the sugar, bump the speed up to medium-high and beat the crap out of it.”
To eat is a necessity; to eat ‘healthy’ is an art.
Unbeknown to the driver, I had digitally recorded the entire contact. Complaint squashed. It's always fun to listen to them back stepping when they're told "You know I listened to the Officer's recording of the traffic stop...."
Needless to say, Italian food has always been a huge part of my life. It's played an even bigger role since J came along. When we first started dating, I bribed him to visit me in Brooklyn by promising to cook dinner (spedini). Poor J went through hazing by attending his first Sunday family dinner. To make it worse, at Christmas Eve dinner (he proposed that morning) my family made him stand on the fireplace and tell the whole proposal story. He was officially initiated into the family when he helped fill cannoli shells just hours before our wedding rehearsal/dinner.
Romans 4:13-17
Autumn can be at times like that:
This is the story the best friend of Jesus would have told to help us see Jesus for Who and What He really was and to help us to believe in Him.
Those events which can not be buried and hidden away are presented as something other than what they are, as with the true nature of the so called Arab “spring” the real ethnic make up of the “English” rioters or the reality of underage sexual grooming in Britain.
Want to shop the look?
I desire visions of glory. How ’bout you?
It's a good way to avoid looking railroady. Even if the adventure actually is. The players won't realize it because wherever they are investigating, they will be able to advance the story. You will be able to steer them where you wanted them to go in the first place by still giving them the clues that will take them to the next part.
For centuries, when London Bridge was the only river crossing into the city, the gates were locked at night, so travellers to and from the south would set off from and arrive at Southwark. By Hewnry VIII's time Borough High Street was one long line of inns. The Tabard – Chaucer’s start point for the Canterbury Tales – was right next door. Neighbouring on the other side was the White Hart, mentioned by Shakespeare in Henry VI, and featuring heavily in Charles Dickens’ Pickwick Papers. Dickens was also a regular at the George, and mentions it by name in Little Dorritt. And Shakespeare - who lived just down the road for a few years – almost certainly performed plays in the inn-yard before the Globe was built.
Not shopping for clothes except at resales.
1923 The first FA Cup Final was held at Wembley Stadium. 200,000 people arrived at a stadium which was only designed to hold 125,000 and when 60,000 irate fans rushed the turnstiles a human torrent swept onto the pitch. Players were engulfed by the crowd and 1,000 men, women and children were injured. Finals were made ‘all ticket’ after that. The game began one hour late and Bolton beat West Ham 2-0.
Today I am wearing my new vest top featuring "The Boss".
in this place a relic. place it
He knew well before that Whit was poison, but he couldn’t stay away.
DAY 20: Go Christmas Caroling
As healing seems to be high on the agenda at the moment here is a little bit about healing herbs and plants..I am not an expert, so this list is by no means complete and comprehensive..its just a guide to help you understand this subject a bit better.
I was sad to hear today about the death of comedian Gregg Jevin. I met him around five years ago and I was going to write his autobiography. Eventually, it fell through because I could not get through to the real person.
Fatigue can set in at any time of the day. Maybe you get drowsy after lunch, or maybe you suffer from low energy levels throughout the day. Whatever the cause of your tiredness, you can beat fatigue with these seven great energy-boosting tips!
Olivia could feel the officer’s fingers make their way down to her womanhood. Suddenly she felt a finger being inserted slowly into her and she let out a muffled moan. This was so degrading, she kept thinking. She tried not to think about it but the officer’s slow movements actually felt good. After a moment she removed her hand.
Finally it is Saturday again! and Saturday means a new sketch and a new challenge at the Waltzing Mouse Stamps Sketch challenge. This month we'll have sketches from Renee Lynch and I can assure you you'll LOVE them! This is the first one - GREAT isn't it!!!???
Aspartame breaks down into three toxic components:
24.) I Took On The Asbestos Altgeld Gardens Mess - NOT EXACTLY, you were
When I leave it pulls me back, it calls to me. It reminds me that one time when I was young it became a part of me in more ways than one. It reminds me that it will always be a part of me. It reminds me that no matter where I've been, where I am, or where I am going.... I will always come back to the Pacific Ocean, it's only a mere part of what gives me joy!
Yes, the intersection between politics and commerce is very strong.
Some people say that God will let atheists into heaven provided that they have lived good lives, selflessly helping other people. My response is that He would–if there were such a thing as a good atheist!
- Once you’re finished recording, upload your ShowMe to share with the community (or keep it private if you prefer)
His head hung low as he shuffled his feet in self pity. His pouting was both comical and sad, simultaneously. I giggled and his face contorted into a pained expression.
don’t tell anyone
I lie still, and I lend her my silence.
Sometimes Mom would ride along to Grandma’s too, but for the most part I traveled alone. The driver knew where I was going, and he’d hand me off to Grandma when I arrived. There were no cell phones then, I had all the information I needed attached to a safety pin inside my jacket, along with some change. Mom wasn’t worried, and neither was I. It was an adventure! I spent the three-hour ride playing word games, coloring, reading, listening to music, or talking to an elderly seatmate.
Here is the first guest blog in the history of The Fredman Bloggin’. It’s written by The Dadman, currently residing in Lancaster County, PA and it’s the biggest celebrity sighting we’ve had! Take it away The Dadman:
UP TO 44% OFF Outdoor activities with your little one just got a lot easier with Sherpani!
This is a giallo by Lucio Fulci which he made prior to his gore drenched zombie years so it might disappoint some fans but it's still a fine film and has some grizzly moments. I'm a big fan (obviously) of Mr. Fulci and I have seen this film but only once and it was a long time ago. I need to see it again. I don't remember liking it as much as his earlier giallo efforts nor does this giallo outshine other, better films in the genre but it is a fine effort nonetheless and a good film. The stand out here is the score though so I hope you enjoy it. It really does help to "make" the film. Oh and if you didn't know already a key track from the score was used by Tarantino in his film KILL BILL VOL. 1
God has given all of us a promise we can hold on to: “‘For I know the thoughts that I think toward you,’” says the Lord, “‘thoughts of peace and not of evil, to give you a future and a hope. Then you will call upon Me and go and pray to Me, and I will listen to you. And you will seek Me and find Me, when you search for Me with all your heart’” (Jer. 29:11-13).
Wed-AM: 1:48, 3500' ~ SoBo & Bear Peak
Now we need a direction. We look more carefully at the matter models. The idea of “opposite the direction of motion” comes up quickly, but it is clearly not going to work since we have cases where there is friction and no motion. In every case, though, the force is along the surfaces. Parallel to the surfaces. That turns out to be a super helpful guideline (continuing all the way down the line, long past the end of the balanced forces unit). We then just have to look at the details of the problem at hand, think about which way the atoms are getting sheared, and go from there.
I was amazed and excited. I wondered what the criteria was for joining the ‘other’ SAS, and whether they would accept someone like me. On February 8th I contacted Damian Harvey expressing an interest in the SAS and requesting more information about what it was and how to become part of it. This is a small section of what he sent back to me:
And then I moved on to Jack, and Jack was a joy! Another terrier, Jack was ready and happy to go outside. Slipping on the leash, we walked calmly through the lobby, out the front door, and into the grassy area. Grabbing a few “poo bags” from the dispenser to shove in my pocket, Jack and I started our walk. Jack didn’t pull on the leash, trying to walk me, like Johnny had! Jack walked at the same pace I did, so I thought it would be interesting to see if Jack liked to run. Commencing a slow jog, Jack was right there with me, excited to have the opportunity to run (even if with an aging non-runner!). Impressed with Jack, I knelt down on the grass where I was quickly met with an exuberance of warm, canine charm. Eventually we came to a bench, and I decided to sit down. Jack jumped up beside me, where he appreciatively accepted being petted and having his ears rubbed. It wasn’t long before he was half-in and half-out of my lap!
No rain nor rivers flow
- If it really smells, put it in the laundry basket and keep it there until you decide you want to wear it again (at which point, grudgingly wash it)
Where: M.S. 571 - 80 Underhill Avenue, Brooklyn, NY 11238 - (718) 935-3978
2011/2016 of N13 billion for
Looking forward to a weekend of
When to use: As a foolhardy refrain in the face of inevitable destruction this quote is second-to-none. It’s especially useful when your team is down and an opposing fan is mocking their efforts. That’ll show him!
I already had my center line marked out, so it was an easy process from there. I placed them 15" apart from each other, made my marks, and drilled holes all the way through.
clockwise from top left: cake ball "cabbage patch", cupcakes, cupcake wheelbarrow & flower pot sign, finger puppet & cookie favors
When I told the manager of the safari camp about this case he was astonished. “She wants five million dollars for having an orgasm!” he exclaimed. “How much would she want for a trip to the moon and back? Ten million?”
The Spanish Knotted Feather Stitch is #59 and is in the Knotted Stitches section of 100 Stitches. This was the eighth and final stitch in the knotted stitches section. I think the knotted stitches have become my favorite category of stitches so far :)
Carrie is very picky about the products she endorses, which is why you most likely won’t see a Carrie perfume. Carrie said her big gripe about making her own perfume is that it just doesn’t sound appealing. “I really don’t know if I would do the whole fragrance thing cause I don’t know… I don’t want to smell like anybody else, you go to like Walgreens or whatever and you just see everybody (laughs), so that one’s not quite for me. If people walked up to me smelling like me it might weird me out.”
Here's the finished article -
Laughter filled the souls of many as he delivered humorous tales of hands on spiritual experiences.
So after a good bit of effort put into ensure the cards were well mixed between upright and inverted, on to the initially intended reading...
It has been a tough few weeks around here, but we will get through them. We are scheduled to be at DuPont the next two days for what is going to amount to be loooooong days. We are in the midst of making some changes to her current meds, looking for more effective pain management.
Zombie Mind Suckers, formerly known as the GOP.
I've been lax in writing because I'm still reeling from our chance encounter, this secret boyfriend and I. It happened about two weeks ago on a grassy knoll with tiny fairy lights flickering. It was so beautiful I think I even heard music playing.
"Chriiiiiissssssss......take my picture, Chriiiiiisssssssssssss......" it says.
So that’s about it for now, a country of change-ups, a crazy life of wanting the other side and ending up more or less failing. Got any more change-up stories? Share it here or in facebook!
I have been working against the clock to get this card finished so that I can get it posted today - don't want to miss a day! I have been golfing with Barry at Retford and we didn't get home until 5:30 and then I had my Thursday Crafting Club here until 10 ish.
The Government
A method for making a product in a bioreactor comprising: i) culturing microorganisms, wherein the microorganisms are adapted or mutagenized so as to exhibit at least a 150% product tolerance for the product compared to the product tolerance of a corresponding non- adapted or non-mutagenized microorganisms; and ii) harvesting said product.
Our favorite neighbor and treasurer for the Crown Heights North Association Valorie Bowers came by. Valorie is super special for us. She represents a side of African American life in Brooklyn that is almost lost. A resident of the Crown Heights area for over 50 years, she lives in the same house she grew up in. Whenever she comes over, its a guarantee for good times and great conversation!
Oh I'm not materialistic. Be in tune with yourself, nature and the universe, not crap like that. I buy lots of unexpensive stuff that regularly gets recycled/donated to charity.
No worries. I am made of money.
‘Forward, the Light Brigade!
And anything else that catches our fancy through the year. I am pretty sure we will be adding Beast Academy to Quince’s line up later. I am thinking about Life of Fred too. I will be purchasing a telescope very soon. And Quince really wants a rock tumbler. He is also becoming a little artist so tons of supplies are always on our list.
A caricature of compassion that left you sickly drawn
Once the Queen had the sign contract in her hand she knew it was time to grant me, the Princess Vet, My own lands. Where else to have the Royal Zoo? The wonderful Land of Oz!!
Monday: Spaghetti and Meatballs
Me: Uh-huh….but, it seems to be rather inaccurate.
My friend who sells pencils and balloons.
oh, if I'd only seen that the joke was on me.
Of course now I don't use it like I used to when I cooked all the time, so I think I'll have Rosa and Gaspar come harvest it all and check to make sure they get ALL the little seed pods outta the hole this time.
The excavations here have contributed much to our understanding of the period, the patient archaeologist having transcribed and interpreted the minutiae of Romano-British domestic life spanning several centuries. But perhaps most fascinating is the evidence of Roman religious belief, the transition from polytheistic paganism to Christianity, which appeared to exist side-by-side. The ‘deep room’ below ground level, is thought to have been a cult room where pagan water deities may have been worshipped – evidence of this being paintings of water-nymphs on the walls. Two marble busts found in the deep room suggest that Roman ancestors may also have been venerated – the Imperial Cult – possibly at a later date. But of even greater historical importance is the ‘house-church’ and its ante-chamber above the cult room which demonstrate the supersedence of paganism by Christian worship. Wall paintings, reconstructed from plaster fragments (some of which are on display in the British Museum), depict six figures in Romano-Christian prayer, and feature Chi-Rho and alpha and omega symbols. Unique to Romano-Britain, the wall paintings of the house-church are internationally important – the closest parallels are found in Syria.
So just why is he not a popular figure? Many fans will say that it is not the decisions he’s made that they opposed, but a lack of communication around why they were made.
damned nonsense for that food
Some of these are in the process of becoming fabric. I'm still all over the place with color but eventually I hope to create things that match up--large, medium and small scale prints. Something smallish to cut and sew that could be stuffed and then embellished with beads and then worn on a kumihimo cord like a pendant
Crafty Hugs Craftybird Lisa xxx
The first thing I am going to do is define what missions is biblically and then what that has to do with our lives.
I really loved the CPS sketch this week and had to take a second stab at it. I mixed it up with a different style and images... and had a BLAST using these sweet Pure Innocence images!
DVD: 1.78:1
Digital scrapbook designers – I also have a commercial use set of gingham overlays that is new and 50% off. This is a great, fast, low-priced tool to make classic papers. The preview shows how there is a little bit of distressing done where the stripes don’t cross over for a great, realistic look.
These flowers you must try today. All of you have the material to make them, probably within arm's reach:
When we were up in the NorthWest, I was trying as many different beers that I could, since most of my choices aren't available back in Ohio. Widmer Brothers offers a 12 pack sampler with 4 different beers to try, so that makes buying at the beer store much easier (and cheaper!).
Hell, the episode ends on yet another downer note. Well…not necessarily a downer, but definitely one of dread. And how could it not? Especially after Sokka’s brilliantly idiotic line: “Everything’s gonna work out perfectly, from now on and forever.” Uh huh.
to spend over at The Ribbon Girl online store jam packed full of yummy ribbons...buttons...charms and loads of gorgeous new bits and pieces to add to your crafty stash...that is if you can make up your mind what to spend your prize on...
4. I’m a natural pessimist. Come by it honestly, from my farmer father and grandfather. Expect the worse, we say, and what you get will always be better. Usually.
Despite the material comfort of my racial privilege, I felt profound despair and enormous fear. There was no good outcome that I could envision. Either this violent and unjust system of racial oppression would continue or, like most other whites, I thought Black South Africans would rise up and kill us all.
That all men else go with him;
Thanks so much for your sweet comments, it is such a pleasure to read them !
At an optometrist's office.
Christianity is growing worldwide.
Go now doubt
I have hope that I will exercise for long enough to release some endorphins today……….
McGinniss is far from claiming sole responsibility. As he sees it, Palin faced two problems running for the Republican nomination this year: she didn’t have a hope of winning and any attempt would expose her to the sort of scrutiny that would put at risk her lucrative new career as a political celebrity.
What is your favorite holiday destination and why?
Yes, they are in the wrong. No, they are not the devil. A couple of fags a day doesn't mean they will be bad parents. And I would hazard a guess that they are feeling guilty enough already, without thousands and thousands of strangers judging them and calling into question their parenting skills. In fact I would guess that every time Stacey Solomon has lit up a cigarette since the day she found out she was pregnany she has felt guilty. So she should, you might say. Quite. But she doesn't need half the world telling her that.
My words were greeted with stunned silence and also some surprise. Obviously the males present had not thought about this possibility. Hopefully without being too judgmental, dare I say sexism was still alive and well around that table?
Holidaying can be such a learning experience.
Launch Photos:
Whilst once relying heavily on seafood exports and the fishing industry, Iceland has undergone an economic revolution in recent years. Developments in the financial sector have lead to the Nordic nation becoming one of the world’s richest countries, despite having a population of just over 300,000 people.
She's very deserving. now you have done a great deed. :)
-On the 5th of every month, you will receive your penpal pairing via email. It will be your responsibility to contact your penpal and get their mailing address and any other information you might need like allergies or dietary restrictions.
This recipe turned out quite nice and my kids love it very much.
Because being idle is wrong..... isn't it?
Kyla - Every time we leave a coffee date with another designer, or a design event, we feel inspired. We have so much to learn from each other, which is one of the reasons we’re working towards an island chapter of IDIBC. We hope that by creating opportunities for designers to come together regularly the inspiration becomes contagious.
It's a glistening star
To share our excitement with YOU, our very valued customers, we will have a drawing for a $25 gift certificate to the embellish IT! online store. All you need to do is visit the store, find your favorite NEW item, and tell us which product is your favorite in the comments section of this post. We will draw a winner on Monday night - February 8th. We will announce the winner in next Tuesday's post - February 9th.
Balance
I hope you know how much I wanted to give each of you a hug of sisterly gratitude.
(The Cheating)
“What is it?” asked Bantum of Dr. Chickenheimer.
Have seen a very nice house, very nice indeed. In walking distance of supermarket, just on edge of town.
After Hours Parties
Paint the plates with color. The most nutritious vegetables are bright- and deep-colored. Think the orange of sweet potatoes, the crimson of tomatoes, the claret of beets. Vegetables add verve and color to a plate, especially compared to cooked meat. Use the color to please the eye and inspire the appetite.
P.S. I finished that evil task-hehe.
I revel in it, my eyes half-closed,
Of those whose dice fell on the wrong side of the tracks
We managed to visit St Michaels church on Michaelberg. The climb to this hill was worth it through meadows and vineyards from which we could see the other hills with the churches.
Jesus said it very clearly in a variety of ways. His Father was the vinedresser, who was cutting off every branch that bore no fruit, and pruning every branch that did bear, so that it bore more fruit. The pruning was painful, but the most disturbing thought was the potential of being a dry branch that had no fruit at all on it. To be cut off from the vine—to dry up and whither, and finally to be gathered for the fire… Again, Jesus said that there was one variety of seed only, scattered in a multitude of situations, but what varied was the soil. Some soil was rocky, on which the seed sprang up, but had no endurance; some was weedy, and the seed came up, but was choked by the cares of living, by wealth and by possessions; some was on the path, and the seed itself was stolen by crows—this was the devil’s opportunity to steal the message of salvation; and finally there was the good soil which was marked by only one clear sign: reproduction of seed. Again, Jesus said there was a farmer who planted grain, and the ground produced the shoot, then the stalk, then the head, then seed in the head—he knew not how—it was a mystery—but the farmer began to prepare for harvest when he saw the seed emerge.
Some clarification is needed. This is about the fact that there are African Christians (in the UK) who hold that no one should listen to what they describe as ‘secular’ music. In this community and context, ‘secular’ is taken to mean the commercial popular musics of Western origin – right across the genre bandwidth. R’n’b, hip-hop, nu-soul, pop, dance music forms of the modern club-craze variety and the rest.
For those who would embrace these words as evidence of a coming Revolution, one would advise caution. These remain questions put to the laity, and we should trust that the issue remains one for discussion and not the outline of a pre-determined plan whose features and priorities are already set out. For those who would dismiss this as next week’s fish-wrap, the remarkable boldness must surely make one think again.
I did enjoy clicking through all the scenes to find various magical objects. It would be more rewarding, though, if we could unlock, say, a special Chocolate Frog card after we’d collected all the others. It gives you a reason to find everything. I also wish we could look at what we’ve collected. I don’t mean that J.K. Rowling has to write pages and pages of the magical books that we find. It would be nice, though, if we could read a page or two, or look more closely at our Chocolate Frog cards. I liked reading the extra information about the series that you can unlock, especially the Minerva McGonagall and the Petunia & Vernon Dursley pages. I laughed a lot at the description of Petunia and her fiance (Vernon) meeting Lily Potter and her boyfriend (James). The Dursleys page also explained why the Dursleys take Harry with them to that hut on the rock – they believe the superstition that wizards can’t cross water. I’d always thought they just hoped not to be found there. I was very interested in ‘The Original Forty’ – the original 40 Hogwarts students in Harry’s year, with all sorts of edits to their names and personalities - because I am a writer too (although not a famous one yet!) and I edit my characters quite a bit. Yes, some of the information can be found by looking in the books, but some is new. I can’t wait until they get farther along in the series and we can learn more about the members of the Marauders, the Order of the Phoenix, and the Death Eaters!
Not only does this book hold out help for financial management, but time management as well. Tristi offers her own insights on her job cutbacks as an example of what to keep and what to toss to free up more productive time. Her experience gave me some food for thought, and that’s the best kind - calorie free and full of nutrients that go directly to the brain.
If Rais cannot understand that, it raises into question the integrity of his scholarship for his doctoral dissertation on the excesses of executive power under the Mahathir Mohamad regime.
Traditionally with the Celtic Cross reading, it would be slipped beneath the first two cards of your spread, hitherto never to be referred to again! Well, what's the point of THAT?!
Both of these cards are very close to the card kit designs, with the primary exception being that I changed one of the patterned papers in each. The paper in the kit was quite nice (and I'm actually using it on other cards that are in progress) but I love this striped paper from my stash and the colours are just so perfect! I also lightened the look of card #2 by adding a white border.
Stephanie Christie / Mindnight - An Argument / 55
This movement is about all children, who also happen to be people. People, like us, who have good days and bad days. People, like us, who aren't always aware of the effects their "behavior" has on the people around them.
Made of soft and shimmery silk, SOPHIA Silk Gown is an off the shoulder, figure flattering, floor length confection that will make you stand out in a crowd.
Fossilized Raptor – Archaology
I have two sons and I’ve discovered the joys of children’s books all over again with them as they grow. I never got on very well with modern adult books. I’m not grown-up enough.
“I’m not going to answer until you…”
Day 302: Fly Bird
But anyway, I really want to say thank you! Thank you so much for all your prayers and good thoughts! It means the world to me! :) And thank you so much to my parents and my real life friends. You guys are awesome! My friend, Julie called and asked me if she could pick up anything from the store for me. I said, "Maybe some Jello." She came by with $300 worth of groceries! Ginny and Doreen were right there, offering to take my kids to football and cheer and help out in any way they could. Thank you!!!
Normal practice is for me to drop her at school without so much as a tiny tinkle.
Does your relationship swing back and forth between a lot of emotional distance (clammed up) and being very close?
The X Factor may have been a screaming noise machine made up almost entirely of unwarranted hype but at least it wasn’t Karaoke Battle USA which removed all the fun of karaoke (namely drunk people singing badly) instead doubling down on bland merely okay singers. If an overlong singing competition featuring people who still need to read the lyrics in order to perform wasn’t bad enough Karaoke Battle USA also introduced the world to the manic antics of judge Carnie Wilson who somehow managed to make Paula Abdul appear restrained in comparison.
Its eggs of confusion and discontent
Soooo many things to blog about and still so less time!!!
1 container of strawberries, sliced
You took my hand in yours, ‘It’s time, William.’
Now Apple is making that process a little cheaper for those still using older versions of the operating system. By removing the cost of Snow Leopard from the equation, customers now only need pay the $30 for OS X Lion. Considering iCloud itself is free and users were paying for MobileMe, the whole thing leaves customers better off. That is, assuming they never used any of the features that didn’t make the transition from MobileMe to iCloud. iDisk, anyone?
There is also a lot of work in our future in the next little while. The wheels are in motion but it’s going to take some time for all the pieces to be put into place. Sometimes the “to do” list feels a little daunting.
Then one fateful day in August 2008, the young couple left their four small children in the care of grandparents and took off on a day trip via Cessna. Christian had recently earned his pilot’s license, and they were up for adventure, along with Christian’s flight instructor and friend. They spent a beautiful day flying to New Mexico to visit Christian’s family’s ranch. En route to home, the three stopped to refuel the plane, and shortly after taking off again, one of the small plane’s engines stalled and the plane crashed. Doug, who was at the controls, did not survive. Christian was burned over 30% of his body and suffered a broken back, and Stephanie was burned over 80% of her body.
The resorts and hotels are situated on the outer edge of Jim Corbett National Park. Some of the best resorts that recommended by us (www.corbettnationalpark-india.com) are –
The Obama to Hitler card is also played opposite the Obama as Bolshevik analogy. This imprints the image of a power mad Obama out to turn government into an instrument of state control of industry and by extension to squash personal freedoms and liberties. The Hitler comparison imprints the image of a diabolical Obama out to snatch full dictatorial control of government.
So please don't waste another moment to speak what's on your mind today or in your heart or on your easel and please put it out there. Let's all TOUCH another person's life today with our truth and with the essence of who we are because what's more precious than sharing a piece of ourself with another? The world will be richer for it.
young-and-I-long-ago-
However, it should be noted that the possibility of triggering the MGO would not arise if the vendor of the shares did not hold any more shares in the target company.
When will the World Council of Churches appreciate that it must stop aiding men who kill and maim the innocents?
As I was walking to the front door I felt it happen. A large section of my left back trunk (and as of today) butt and front trunk became numb. I can move fine but it's numb.
Seriously, without any prompting from us, Landon very carefully alternated placing the eggs he found in his and Claire's baskets. JP, whose main goal in life was to beat everyone at everything, preferred a "grab all I can before a grown-up yells at me" strategy, and I, who was more diplomatic but still mostly looked out for myself, do not know where he came from.
Interestingly, Pettis insists that credit cannot really be considered tight in China, rather demand for credit has gone through the roof. In my model, rapidly expanding credit is a sign of a huge inflation problem. For comparison purposes, many forms of credit are still stagnant or declining in the US. This is supposed to end well? For who?
Please tell me if, as a seven-year-old, I was a) one crayon short of a full box of Crayolas; b) wise beyond my years; or c) both, if possible. I recall the 1967 Christmas season, spent earnestly trying to color within the lines of the drawings in my coloring books. My older brother is to blame for my obsession. He had given me a less-than-favorable critique of my artwork.
Manage all Social media avenues for the entire college. Which entails, researching trends on a continual basis, keeping eyes and ears open for impactful posts, tweets, pins, videos and achievement that will encourage interaction and inquiries about Crown College.
Since I've been in the agency business for almost 30 years, people often ask me what's changed. And, undoubtedly plenty has. But, as I like to croon Dooley-Wilson-like, "the fundamental things apply, as time goes by."
Top tier only
Brand: Beano
“Don’t do it, Smacker!” I exclaimed. “However much she says it doesn’t matter, it will always prey on her mind! Just smile enigmatically if she asks. Let sleeping cats lie!”
where Tanya, on her crumbling ledge,
On March 11 Amelia was born. Sadly for her parents she was born to Jesus' arms before they held her in theirs.
I like many things Brian McLaren writes (some more than others). But I love what Brian McLaren writes in an essay called “Christian” in David Kinnaman’s new book UnChristian. His vision is GREAT! Here is what he says…
Anyway, I had the privilege of receiving my beers from one of the original brains behind the whole thing, the chilli growing, hill walking, real ale drinking, food loving, web developing, northerner, Andy (He's very informative on his twitter bio). So, as you can imagine, I had very high hope for the prospective beers I would receive, and was not disappointed (two of the breweries had beers in the Sainsburys beer festival competition this year, and one of them actually won it).
I started to notice I was getting facial hair- my eyebrows and upper lip were getting hairy and my chin too. I had to start waxing and plucking frequently.
Relationships are more complex that “just” feelings or emotion. They are complex down to the core of our souls, and Katniss and Peeta capture that beautifully.
What is left is this question: Is designating an identity liberating? When thinking about this question, I cannot help but relate it to a documentary that I began roughly a year ago that I have been very slowly shooting and piecing together. I have been following a performance art group that performs weekly at a local gay bar. The group is founded by dancers, and is comprised of both men and women, some gay, and some straight. In my first descriptions of the project, I admittedly described it somewhere in the realm of “drag performance art”. What I quickly realized, is that describing what they do as simply drag, is so limiting that it just becomes totally inaccurate. Performing weekly, the group incorporates the use of costume and make up that quickly deviates from the drag queen archetype. They also perform skits, create fantastic video art, read spoken word, choreograph dances and many other things that one would not know to associate with the word “drag”. In fact, if there is any form of a thesis to my project, it is how different each member of the group is, yet they all come together to share this common thing that they have created.
We challenge you to use non traditional supplies on your projects.
Word got round about the movie they was planning to make. Based on that novel of his it was. Had the place buzzing like a saw. Biggest news in the hills since McGregor turned on his wife and kids and swallowed the barrels of his gun.
The tomatoes, peppers, and eggplant were all started about 2 weeks earlier than last year and have now been transplanted out into little pots and are sitting on my cabin table with a light on them. The fruit trees are all budding out and have flowers. The comfrey and rhubarb are popping up everywhere and the bed by the greenhouse most of all. Those plants are already full of leaves and nearly a foot tall. If they don't get killed off by the cold I could probably get a rhubarb harvest in another week or two! Is that normal?
I started my fun day by going back to sleep with no alarms set to wake me up again.But then I guess my body is not used to such kind of indulgence and I woke up only an hour after I had gone off to sleep.Sheesh!!!!So sleeping during the day was crossed of my mental to do list(Yes!!!I made a mental list.Could’nt help it).Got up and read the newspaper leisurely for more than an hour.Lots of newspapers actually.(Usually I hurriedly go through the newspaper’s headlines while having my morning cup of tea and that’s the only dose of daily news I get.)Suddenly I felt all good and knowledgable as crazy as that sounds
But when I returned,
Just this week a young woman was arrested for enticement of a minor and coercion as she was caught in a plot in which it appears she was intending to have sex with a 13 year old boy. This young woman was an attendee of my church. I do not know her and I am incapable of knowing if she truly was a born-again believer or if she was just attending church because she was deceived into thinking simple church attendance was the path to heaven. Maybe she was seeking God and just hadn’t reached the point where she could give her life to Christ. We could speculate on her motives for all time. I leave that to God for you see the Bible teaches this about us in 1 Samuel 16:7 (NKJV) “…For the Lord does not see as man sees; for man looks at the outward appearance, but the Lord looks at the heart."
In half-day mobile workshops guided by professional local artists, young people experience photography as a powerful tool for exploring their communities. Our workshops makes visual arts geographically and technologically accessible by allowing youth in neighborhoods across Los Angeles inside the mechanism of photography, empowering a collective visual exploration of identity, culture, and place.
EC deputy chairperson Wan Ahmad Wan Omar said the errors could be due to the negligence of military officers who have been appointed AROs.
There is no shortage of blog posts, LinkedIn group discussions, or online articles about what voiceover artists should be paid for their non-union work. There are some who will work for any rate they can get, and there are some who have a set fee schedule by which they live and die. I have had the experience of turning down jobs because the rate offered was too low, and I have had my auditions not lead to paying gigs because my requested rate was too high. Two sides of the same coin.
Since I just wrote about lemonade yesterday, what's on my mind today is the old-fashioned entrepreneurship I knew as I kid...when I opened a lemonade stand on those hot summer days. I never had a fancy storefront like this:
The threat of war with the Speicans is a constant threat, and one that grows more frightening as she and Caelan train toward their eventual knighthood. Aislinn has committed herself to serving Arnhem, and has promised herself as King's Champion when Caelan claims the throne. She is willing to give up everything... her childhood, her life, even her heart for Arnhem. No matter the pain it brings.
As part of Jewish New year I’ve been reading Psalms and came across these two lines from psalm 47 which I thought I’d share. I liked it so much I’ve written it on my wall above my desk.
Moving on to the other big stories this week, we are back in recession, the economy shrunk by 0.2%, it’s a double dip.
Dion dodged a bullet when he decided not to spend $36 for a seat on a small airplane after finishing a stop on the Winter Dance Party tour in February 1959. That was the same plane that went down shortly after takeoff, killing Buddy Holly, Ritchie Valens, and The Big Bopper. Dion said he couldn't justify paying that much for one ride, considering that was the same amount his parents paid each month to rent his childhood apartment!
Am really happy with both layouts
TEACH WHAT YOU KNOW
That next Friday was Good Friday, and some dear friends who moved back east some years ago were in Santa Barbara for the day to visit. This was our first time meeting their son, who’s almost exactly one year younger than Logan--such a sweet little guy! We enjoyed some great food together, took our coffees & kiddos to the park, and embraced the food coma while the little guys ran around. It was so great to see them!
the last few weeks have seen me aiming in the decidedly GRINCH direction. Thanks to Ryan at Pacing the Panic Room, who pointed me at the Bloggess. Not that many people read my blog, but if you happen upon it, please go see what she has done....it will BLOW you away.....She is actually the kind of writer I wish I were, but more importantly, she is the person we ALL wish we could be!
I can remember the void left “where love goes” far more easily than my first memory or experience of love. The fact remains, as a child, despite my best efforts to turn off the plain, obvious, total envelopment of love my life was, I passed it by or tuned it out like an Autistic Vulcan.
1 detect
With regards to our health, we never accept less. We would like the greatest results from medical practitioners. However, accidents happen sometimes. We might never wish it to happen nonetheless it can occur and subsequently first thing to do should you become a victim of personal injury claims is to seek advice to claim for compensation if that’s the case.
I admit I have not read the book – so sue me. I did see the movie, knowing what it was based on and knowing the premise. Damn hard movie to watch …which is probably why I’ve never tackled the book. It was far to reminiscent of what cycling is like (and yes I am actually smart enough to be in MENSA – deal with it…I have to)
Edited to add– If you missed the show and would like to listen to it or download it as an mp3, click here and scroll down to the May 2nd show. If the May 2nd show is no longer there, I think you can search the archives for it. It was a wild time! A few funny moments…
Thats right! You definitely read that right, I MADE $0.65 off CVS for this shopping trip!!! Dont ask me how, usually I think you have to add an item to make up for the money, but I think this guy was new and didnt really know what he was doing, so he opened the drawer and handed me the $0.65 that it said I had made! I would have corrected him, except I am not sure of the policy on this....and they where pretty busy. So shame on me, but hey how exciting is that?!
But since then, almost every decision the National government has made has been incorrect. They gave tax cuts that were unnecessary and not “revenue neutral”. They’ve refused to put up the retirement age. They’ve kept borrowing and borrowing and borrowing. They’ve even micro-managed the Christchurch recovery to the point that it’s not happening.
In the mean time here are some images:
Week 2 of football, mind you. I would not make the same call in week 16. Oh, and you're welcome for the pun.
I knew I was nowhere, but the most surprising thing of all was that I was still in the world after all still in the world after all this time, on dot at the lower part of the map. The landscape had gaunt expression, but I could not deny that it had reasonable features and that I existed in it. This was a discovery – the look of it. I thought: Nowhere is a place.
Well anyway, I went to RMK Workshop with my sister today. It's about skin care routine using their skincare products and also makeup lesson by Akinobu Nishimura, makeup artist trained by Rumiko I think? Hahaha.
it's no wonder I find you in a different spot in your crib
We’ll both offer words of encouragement, whether we’ve shed a few kg or not. Words such as “well done, “long-term view” and “you champion”.
Next up was the purple dress I made for the wedding, teamed with a long purple skirt (it was windy out, and my leggies were cold) – it was pretty comfortable, tbh, and had stood up well to my brutal washing machine…
Waiting in Ottawa.
The Crow Hill Community Association meets tonight at 7:30pm in the Gospel Tabernacle Church at 725 Franklin Avenue. The meeting promises to be a fascinating one - here's their announcement.
However, while part of the book deals with Nate and his increasing problem of controlling himself and how Evie is going to help him, another part of the storyline is trying to help a client and this is where the book bogs down.
Sofitel Washington, DC Lafayette Square
In this series, four Christian novelists and four nonbelievers will square off. This is not a debate about Christianity. The Christian novelists will write a 750-word blog post on why they write Christian fiction and how they intend to reach the unbeliever, while the nonbeliever will write a 750-word blog post about what they like or don’t like about Christian fiction, citing examples and being specific.
1 med potato, peeled & grated
Amber: Yeah when you fight you go to jail. My brother's in jail. We are going to go get him now.
My Dad was one as well!
I've had a wobble over the novel-in-progress recently anyway. I felt like I was going in the wrong direction, so took a deep breath and cut loads of it out. (Ouch.) Then I had a panic about how my word count had plummeted and an oh-shit-I-am-never-going-to-finish-this! freak-out. (Heeeeeelp!) BUT today I think I've turned a corner. Now I feel I'm back on track. I just have to keep plodding along, like Eddie Izzard, one foot after another, one word after another... and have a little faith that I'll get there in the end.
standing like monoliths looking toward the sea,
I have attended yoga classes once in a while for a couple of months now. I wanted to be consistent in my practice but for one reason or another I could not afford to go on a daily or even every other day practice. Nevertheless, I value the things I gain from each yoga class that I attend.
“I think perfect objectivity is an unrealistic goal; fairness, however, is not.”
Because everyone has more than one face.
There seems to be only two organizations that I know of that comes close to being able to offer legitimate reasons against the ban on exotic animal ownership, REXANO and one that goes out and has helped private owners whether members or not, USZA. You are welcome to go to their websites and read the truth about Private Exotic Animal Ownership…No where near what tyhe Animal Right Fanatics want you to believe!!!
I am with Di......Ch......and we.......called.....Food.
For me language and culture, including literature and film, are totally intertwined. There are many things which now constitute an emerging global culture with McDonald’s and Hollywood in the vanguard. Learning other languages gives you access to something different, to the real local culture. For me the arts provide manifestations of culture and language provides the key to unlocking much of that. For me concentrating on language without any focus on literature is like drinking cola flat, there is something quite essential missing.
The game last night started at 6:00pm. Don’t let the sun fool you. It was 34* and windy. At the end of three hours I couldn’t feel my toes. I haven’t been that chilled in a very long time. The boys looked miserable.
3) I got a 50mL sample of Pantene Pro-V Aqua Light Shampoo + Conditioner. (Full sized shampoo (375mL) and conditioner (374mL) are $6 each.)
Look at locks to confirm that they were indeed locked.
We’re leaving momentarily for the night train to visit the Shaolin Temple (and nearby sights over 3 days, like Longmen giant Buddha caves, & ancient capital of Luoyang). In province of Henan.
McGinniss devotes hilarious and scurrilous pages to the mystery of little Trig, the Down syndrome baby born soon after Palin won John McCain’s endorsement. “The story she tells of her pregnancy and the birth simply can’t be true,” says McGinniss who wonders if the “birth” was designed to make Palin the poster child of the Right to Life.
And I pledge to be a better blogger...
I’m partial to Marylin Mason. I think he’s sexy. Stop judging me. He’s also super smart and articulate with very good opinions on things like violence and the media. I digress… the Depeche Mode original is obviously awesome as well. I enjoy this part:
I'm loving all these little life moments that I wasn't always able to capture on my big camera. I could eat 'em all up with a spoon. I may have gone a little hog wild, but here's a mishmash of my fist week on Instagram....
Can you tell I'm a sucker for kid's prints? I have never met one I didn't like! I made an I Spy quilt for my son many years ago, and just never stopped collecting fabrics for another one. One of these days, I need to make about ten I Spy quilts.
Today I chose colors by Chinovi Cosmetics. I’ve been stepping outside of my comfort zone and using more greens and these green from Chinovi were a joy to work with. Very pretty and nice blendability.
In the meantime, I had planned to go walking with a friend,
Trampoline Bear Abuse or Cool Critter Celebration? As Shepard Smith‘s beloved Ole Miss progresses forward with its mascot pick of the Rebel Black Bear to replace Colonel Reb, the Studio B and Fox Report anchor continues to be conflicted about moving forward from his signature segment “Bear Alert” to a more animal-friendly “Cool Critters.” As a case in point, last Thursday, Shep reported the very same story (about a newborn Atlanta panda cub) under the respective rubrics differently on his two daily FNC programs: To wit, on Studio B, Shep narrated the tale as the “Bear Alert,” accompanying it as usual with the cruel Trampoline Bear video (showing a tranquilized bear falling from a tree onto a trampoline, being hurled high into the air, and then crashing headfirst into the unyielding ground) whereas on the Fox Report, Shep retold it as a “Cool Critters” story without the repugnant Trampoline Bear clip.
Perhaps I should open a book on when this appointment will actually occur?
Venomous vs. Poisonous
Leaf Cup Get Gold on Carapace Cup and Assistant Cup
I glazed the tart with a bit of simple syrup to add a bit more sweetness and shine. I think I can skip that next time or use a warmed marmalade.
I also remember that her shoulders were very broad when she was born. Her brother, born three years before, had not had those broad shoulders. She was very long. She measured 23 inches and weighed 7 lbs., 7 oz. She was also 20 days post-mature and I lost weight during the last two weeks so it’s very likely that she would have been another pound heavier had she been born earlier.
It just cracks me up.
Oh, to add to the irony, white people tan all the time.
OMF diamond-encrusted God. And, also, is Cracked not only written for 14 year old boys but staffed by them as well?, because holy shit. If you learned everything you know about women from a 15 second Zales commercial, you probably shouldn’t be editorializing about the fairer sex.
Bake 325 degrees for about an hour in an 8 X 4" loaf pan.
03. Black Mirror
I’m getting ahead of myself. You dip the beet rollups into the tempura batter, and carefully lower them into the oil. The first one I put in made the oil bubble like crazy, and within seconds it was (only slightly) burned. So I turned it down. And then, after a few batches, it was taking what felt like forever to cook. So I turned it up…You get the picture.
8. How did you become interested in 3? I started watching it when it first aired
All good. So we rugged up and headed off up the mountain. The drive was only about 40 minutes from Wollongong, and it’s a nice scenic drive.
It only took me one listen to realize Rotten Sound hadn't made any headway since their disappointing Cycles. Calling it a slide might be a bit too much, rather than a fall like 90's Napalm Death, the band has simply repeated themselves and added only tweaks and bugs to their execution with recent releases. That stomach churning guitar tone that was responsible for clearing whole forests back in 2005 with Exit has been diminished to a digital liquid soup with lack of character. The grime that covered every inch in Exit (including the hostile artwork) has been blunted into a fatter, boring-er sound. The vocals have lost whatever punch they had and are some of the most repetitive and uninteresting around (this would be a title fight between Deafeatist in the land of the inane). Songs lack character and definition, possibly a symptom of using such a muddied guitar tone; but somehow all those Swedes back when made it work.
This morning as I stood by the window snapping a few pics, I noticed that the plumage of our little American Goldfinches is already starting to brighten a bit. Although, it may just be wishful thinking on my part.
“Serenity Now!!!”
I love action-packed superhero guy movies because Dad loved them first. I remember one year for his birthday Dad wanted to go see the mid-night showing of Pirates 2. So I bought the tickets and he drove. We sat in line and talked. I have a hard time going to see those kinds of movies without him.
Greg shakes his head, “Nope, won’t work,” he refuses.
This is no mere superstition.
Wait patiently until Friday night, March 9th. The contest will close at 9pm California time.
I guess the first thing that happened is that I moved. What a fiasco that was! If it could go wrong it did! I can't even remember all the disastrous things that happened. I know that I ended up being at our new town staying with my in-laws for a LOT longer that I had anticipated before Prince Charming could join me. I love my in-laws, they are the best, but it was crowded and uncomfortable and NOT fun!
Then add the crushed tomatoes along with the juices, red pepper flakes, and some of the pasta water (if mixture is too dry) into the pan. Turn heat to low and simmer for 10 minutes, season with salt & pepper. Add the octopus into the sauce and let it simmer for 5 minutes. Turn off the heat and add the cooked pasta with the sauce and toss well.
Hey Roger. Thanks for taking the time out to talk to me. ‘Spy Kids – All The Time In The World In 4D’ is currently out on DVD!
Warning: Mailbox Monday can lead to envy, toppling TBR piles and humongous wish lists.
Horseback is the brainchild of guitarist, vocalist, and producer Jenks Miller, and across previous releases he has shown not only the capability but the imaginative and inspiring skill of bringing as mentioned an array of flavours and styles across the metal genres into creations which leave a lasting and deep impression. Half Blood is no different, its stunning and impressive chapters bringing a maelstrom of drone, psychedelic rock, doom, black metal, post-rock and more into a layered and textured trial for the ear and journey for the emotions. It is not a release that holds your hand from the start and leads you easily into its midst though neither is it cold or hard to climb on board with, but it asks for and requires a continued union and persistent interaction for its full and striking rewards to come forth.
I think the main difference is the cooking time..
made an electromagnet
The book doesn’t end in a cliffhanger but the ending introduces a new plot line to keep the reader returning.
Right last week i was on my way to work and happened to hit some traffic.....now it was a lovely sunny day lots of people about...riding bikes etc....i stopped at the traffic lights next to this grassy area that leads on to the local park (i guess i dont know really)....and just as i thought my day was going to be a bad one.....this man came riding over the grass holding what looked like a scotch egg (if your not from over here you may not kno what this is.....its a snack sent from the heavens :P).......so anyway this man came riding past holding his heaven snackage....funny huh? ok thats not the end of the story....i found myself staring at him just as he hit, what can onli be described as an invisible trip wire....which sent him headfirst over hishandle bars and crashing to the ground......(what about the god touch edible magicness he was holding i hear you ask)....well dont worry he managed to keep hold of it...stand up and walk away pushing his bike..............EPIC FAIL!!!
For our third painterly launch we seamlessly move into the Autumn season of mists and mellow fruitfulness. Join us on a fragrant walk through majestic country estates, where misty mornings mingle with soft sun on antique stone and Byzantine colours merge with swirling atmospheric incense . Stately aromatic scents were our muse for this autumnal set, spiced with classical timeless French named perfumes inspired by Patrick Suskind's novel 'Perfume'. More inspiration was derived from country house gardens and their famous creators pulling together this seasons aromatic and historical assault on the senses!
I went to bed.
Winding across wide water, without sound.
When to use: Once full blown euphemism and/or sugar coating stage begins. Especially useful during halftime and postgame interviews. Verbatim quotage is discouraged – replace words in question with suitable terms.
My old work crew Communion celebrated their second birthday on Thursday. This firstly means it’s been two years since I worked there, secondly that it’s been two years since they released their first compilation, and finally gives everyone an excuse for a piss up. Which I think everyone willingly took part, and more importantly succeeded, in. They’ve also gone and released this too:
The Customer Service Professionals Association will make awards to companies in several categories this spring, including: Employee Engagement — “embedding a customer experience mindset throughout the organization.”
As it was, though, I sat there and quietly stepped away from the edge of the darkness, smiling and thankful that my mom was at home and not in prison.
Stretch.
"Mm-mmm, I think it is!"The book ends with this summary of what we've read about and seen in the illustrations:
Such purported profound and passionate zeal for the rule of law by the AG turns into mere political BN propaganda when one applies it to his pathetic excuses for not pressing charges against the two reporters of the Al-Islam magazine who had committed a most sacrilegious act against the Catholic community.
Grace and his colleagues try to find Michael – seemingly an impossible task. They don’t know if he is in danger, but they don’t want to take any chances…meanwhile, time is running out for Michael. With no food or water and no way of attracting help, he is getting desperate. And the one person who should be able to help seems intent on remaining silent…
All we need is faith and trust and enough unconditional love to make it stick.
The lyrics to one of his songs says it best:
sweet joy’s core;
In future I’ll have to remember the distinction.
Do any of you have any insight to share? Either your own experiences or friends?
Deal?
Boil the pasta as instructed on the package. I made 3/4 of a package of rigatoni and mine went for about 13 minutes. When they are done, drain but don't rinse.
The minister officially opened the path and then welcomed Arry who had just completed the whole thing, running 39 marathons in 39 days all around the coast of Wales to raise money for Velindre – amazing!
The EDL is not a group that can look into the future. The EDL simply couldn't have known that this man was a nutcase planning an act of destructive terrorism. He may have never said a word about any of this. So the Jeremy Paxmans and Nick Lowles of this world are basically saying that the EDL should have known that this man would carry out a terrorist attack in about a year’s time (i.e., after he had visited England last year). That’s how pathetic these attempts to smear the EDL are and why guilt by mere association is not guilt at all.
My sweet husband surprised me on my birthday with a surprise card shower! Bless his heart, he packed 78 cards and over 50 email into his suitcase without me knowing it and the morning of my birthday made me breakfast and called me in and there they all were! I was completely surprised, which is very tough to pull off! I felt so much love and shed lots of tears. I am the most blessed woman on the planet, that's for certain.
Stick with foods that have substance… if you pair this beer up with some bland pasta dish or fish, you won’t even taste the subtle nuances the chef may have created for you. Instead, lean toward roasted or grilled gamey meat like goose & venison, or saltier meats like ham, or a burger with thick-cut smoked bacon. In the cheese world, swiss can actually compaire/contrast nicely with the creaminess and sweetness of the beer.
any authority or pretended authority in hostility to the United States;
Whip your cream & then fold into your Cream Cheese
Projection, Greater (Magic, Psionic)
I have a techy problem, and being super non-techy I have no clue how to solve it.
"I am pretty sure I have met you or seen you before."
“It’s like reading a science fiction book while watching a Western.”
There are three things that Jesus talks about in this passage of scripture: Giving to the needy, Prayer, and Fasting. Our youth minister gave the sermon, and she pointed out something I’d never noticed before. In talking about these behaviors Jesus does say “if” you do these things, but rather He starts with the word “when” – as in “When you give to the needy,” “When you pray,” and “When you fast.” He assumes those He is teaching will or already do these things and He focuses on how they should be done.
I melted the sugar and used it as glue for my gingerbread house puzzle. The house didn't look too bad, and I felt with suitable use of icing I would be able to disguise the worst incidences of subsidence! I have to say I am quite pleased with the result! What do you think?
Congrats again to all my little friends. Wishing each of you a smooth transition to Primary One and an enriching school life ahead!
“I hate television. I hate it as much as peanuts. But, I can’t stop eating peanuts.” ~ Orson Welles
Date: Thu, 17 Aug 2006 19:45:54 -0700
More than likely I won’t have an issue with it.
Cushing
Thank you for not becoming one more in a string of retail disappointments - your constant drive to remain service-oriented is a wonder to me in an age of chains that seem to think I am here to serve them, not the other way around.
THE UNDERTAKING: A pregnant teen can't remember how she became impregnated and must control her violent urges before she gives birth.
May 19 San Fransisco, California - Milk Bar
Meanwhile, cook the pasta according to the package directions. Drain, reserving 1 cup of the cooking water. Return the pasta to the pot, add the sauce and the chicken mixture, and toss to coat, If the sauce is too thick, add some of the pasta water to thin it. Serve immediately.
#4 See what St. Matthew adds in Matthew 9:8 But when the multitudes saw this, they were filled with awe, and glorified God, who had given such authority to men.
I want to try new things
Oh, back to the Yak! The other reason this is one of my favourite loads is it was one of the first outings with my riduculously shiny, ridiculously heavy, ridiculously ridiculous gold lowrider wheel with white wall tyre! I’d been looking for a wheel to replace the awful stock one that comes with every BOB trailer for some time and, a trip to Ridelow in Manchester and £40 later, this is what i got… I don’t care how absurd it is, I love it!
Of course, there is always a risk that reviews will be written in bad faith (which is very rare, but does happen) or without a good deal of thought (more common.) But if one writes a book, or a song, or paints a picture, and allows the end product to be made available to the public, one has to accept that not everyone will care for it. Bad reviews can be very hurtful, but there is no escaping them. And the more successful a creative artist is, the more frequent bad reviews are - a paradox, but true, I think.
It's down to the wire now... only 6 more days until Christmas. Not sure if it will all get done, but I'm slowly chipping away. Every year I make cookies for the neighbors and realized this year I forgot to buy tins to put them in. Luckily I have an endless supply of scrapbooking goodies, and was able to come up with this idea..
At the moment the bulk of Ireland’s energy comes from imported oil. Oil accounts for over 60% of Ireland’s overall energy consumption, significantly above the EU average. As Ireland’s economy grew, so did their reliance on imported oil. Ireland is also heavily reliant on gas and Ireland’s consumption of gas is increasing rapidly. There is now a major international shift from oil to gas as a source for power generation.
I spent the first weekend in August on the east side of the state for St. Louis Craft Beer Week. The folks of STL Hops do an amazing job of organizing and executing a week long celebration of craft beer that includes more than 60 events ranging from tastings, beer dinners, meet the brewer gatherings, and a firkin festival. The level of participation for so many events was pretty incredible. I spent Thursday-Sunday in St. Louis and stayed busy from early in the morning until late at night. It's fairly absurd that some of these things are considered work. Crazy!
Whaley was inside the home when deputies arrived and was kneeling over his grandmother’s body, cradling her head. He surrendered without incident, deputies said.
Tensions between Macedonians and the Albanian minority spiraled after a rumour spread that the killers might have been Albanian.
Several reasons account for Vietnam’s low growth quality. Inefficient use of human resources, capital and energy is mainly to blame. Vietnam’s labor productivity growth for 2001-2010 was merely 5.1%. In comparison, China’s, Thailand’s, Malaysia’s and Korea’s were over two times, about 4.5 times, 12 times and 23.5 times higher, respectively.
And most important, respect that. Don’t look scandalised when I whip out my not-certified- by- your- authority- of- choice- marshmallows to roast at my braai. I would not be eating them and passing the packet around if I had these doubts, and I’m sure, neither would you…
Am in New Orleans with mom. Eating good food, enjoying the sights, and falling back in love with the city. Had lunch at Camellia Grill and a fabulous dinner at Maspero's.
Things got a bit blurry at the end. I mean, I definitely remember bending one through her. (And I turned in quite a performance, I can tell you - despited the obvious constraints of being up against some bins round the back of All Bar One.) After that, though, it's not so clear.
However, being an active part of a show and tell group can help anybody improve her/his life. It even works in church.
Another triple double?
Few marketers have more than a common “knowledge” about hypnosis. That’s a pity because hypnosis is a very powerful psychological tool—and marketing is all about psychology.
So the Muslim warriors (AlMujahidin) kept on clinging to what this rightly guided caliph (‘Umar) mentioned (as above): And they (Mujahidin) were as they were described by a Roman to a Roman Chief; (he said): I have come to you from the men, very precise in their manners; they ride swift racehorses, during the night they worship (Allah Alone) in seclusion,during the day they are cavaliers, if you speak to your companions something, your friend will not understand anything from you because of the high tone of their voices reciting the Qur’an and the mentioning much of Allah.” So he (the Roman Chief) looked at his companions and said: “It has come to you from them that for which you have no power.”
Insiders at Curtin Immigration Detention Centre, 40km southeast of Derby, said a recent shipment of cigarettes intended for detainees was worth about $10,000. A spokesman for Immigration and Citizenship Minister Chris Bowen refused to say how much the Federal Government spent on detainees' cigarettes, but did not rule out that the Curtin shipment cost as much as $10,000.
And that’s what it really comes down to with DISNEY’S A CHRISTMAS CAROL – it’s a really good adaptation that is, at times, really creepy to look at. It’s a bit disconcerting to see Carrey’s and Oldman’s image shining through so many characters, but the story is really well told, and it’s perfectly paced. Even with the creepiness of performance capture, this is a gorgeous film to watch and completely engaging from start to finish.
